Diagnostic accuracy of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan detection in African tuberculosis suspects and patients.To evaluate a commercially available antigen capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) based on detecting lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine for the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB).Consenting TB suspects and registering TB patients prospectively recruited from three hospitals were asked for two sputum specimens for microscopy and culture, urine for LAM testing and blood for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) testing, with radiological and clinical follow-up for 2 months.Of 427 participants, complete data were available from 397 (307 adult and 23 adolescent TB suspects, and 67 registering TB patients). HIV prevalence was 77%. TB was diagnosed in 195 (49%), including 161 culture-positive patients, and confidently excluded in 114 (29%) participants. LAM ELISA sensitivity was 44% (95%CI 36-52) for culture-confirmed TB (52% in smear-positive patients). Specificity was 89% (95%CI 81-94). Sensitivity was significantly higher in HIV-related TB (52%, 95%CI 43-62, P < 0.001) compared to HIV-negative TB (21%, 95%CI 9-37). Sensitivity in smear-negative patients was low (28%, 95%CI 13-43) for combined HIV-positive and -negative patients.Our findings confirm greater sensitivity of urine LAM detection for HIV-related TB. However, both sensitivity and specificity were suboptimal, suggesting that this version cannot confirm or exclude TB in either HIV-infected or non-infected patients.Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for screening ambulatory HIV-infected persons for tuberculosis.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of the urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test among ambulatory HIV-infected persons.Cross-sectional.HIV-infected persons consecutively presenting to the HIV Clinic at Tembisa Main Clinic in Ekhuruleni, South Africa, were screened for symptoms of tuberculosis (TB) and asked to provide sputum and blood samples for smears for acid-fast bacilli and mycobacterial culture and a urine specimen for a LAM enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Fine needle aspirates were obtained from participants with enlarged lymph nodes and sent for histopathology. Nonpregnant participants underwent chest x-ray.: Four hundred twenty-two HIV-infected participants were enrolled with median age 37 years (interquartile range: 31-44 years), median CD4+ T-cell count 215 cells per microliter (interquartile range: 107-347 cells/μL), and 212 (50%) receiving antiretroviral therapy. Thirty (7%) had active TB: 18 with only pulmonary TB, 5 with only extrapulmonary TB, and 7 with both pulmonary TB and extrapulmonary TB. Twenty-seven percent [95% confidence interval (CI): 12% to 48%] of TB cases were sputum acid-fast bacilli positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the urine LAM compared with the gold standard of positive bacteriology or histopathology were 32% (95% CI: 16% to 52%) and 98% (95% CI: 96% to 99%), respectively. Urine LAM had higher sensitivity in TB cases with higher bacillary burdens, though these differences were not statistically significant.The sensitivity of urine LAM testing is inadequate to replace mycobacterial culture. In contrast to prior research on the urine LAM, this study was conducted among less sick, ambulatory HIV-infected patients presenting for routine care.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis biomarkers in a sandwich immunoassay format using a waveguide-based optical biosensor.Early diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB) remains an elusive challenge, especially in individuals with disseminated TB and HIV co-infection. Recent studies have shown a promise for the direct detection of pathogen-specific biomarkers such as lipoarabinomannan (LAM) for the diagnosis of TB in HIV-positive individuals. Currently, traditional immunoassay platforms that suffer from poor sensitivity and high non-specific interactions are used for the detection of such biomarkers. In this manuscript, we demonstrate the development of sandwich immunoassays for the direct detection of three TB-specific biomarkers, namely LAM, early secretory antigenic target 6 (ESAT6) and antigen 85 complex (Ag85), using a waveguide-based optical biosensor platform. Combining detection within the evanescent field of a planar optical waveguide with functional surfaces that reduce non-specific interactions allows for the ultra-sensitive and quantitative detection of biomarkers (an order of magnitude enhanced sensitivity, as compared to plate-based ELISA) in complex patient samples (urine, serum) within a short time. We also demonstrate the detection of LAM in urine from a small sample of subjects being treated for TB using this approach with excellent sensitivity and 100% corroboration with disease status. These results suggest that pathogen-specific biomarkers can be applied for the rapid and effective diagnosis of disease. It is likely that detection of a combination of biomarkers offers greater reliability of diagnosis, rather than detection of any single pathogen biomarker. NCT00341601.Underestimation of the incremental diagnostic yield of HIV-associated tuberculosis in studies of the Determine TB-LAM Ag urine assay.Quantitative analysis of a urine-based assay for detection of lipoarabinomannan in patients with tuberculosis.Urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) detection is a promising approach for rapid diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB). In microbiologically confirmed TB patients, quantitative LAM detection results increased progressively with bacillary burden and immunosuppression. Patients with disseminated TB and/or advanced HIV are target populations for whom urine LAM detection may be particularly useful.The diagnostic accuracy of urine-based Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected hospitalized patients who are smear-negative or sputum scarce.Hospitals in sub-Saharan Africa are inundated with HIV-infected patients and tuberculosis (TB) is the commonest opportunistic infection in this sub-group. Up to one third of TB-HIV co-infected patients fail to produce a sputum sample (sputum scarce) and diagnosis is thus often delayed or missed. We investigated the sensitivity of urine-based methods (Xpert MTB/RIF, LAM strip test and LAM ELISA) in such patients.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with clinically suspected TB provided a spot urine sample. The reference standard was culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis on ≥1 sputum or extra-pulmonary sample. MTB/RIF was performed using 1 ml of both unprocessed and, when possible, concentrated urine. Each unconcentrated urine sample was also tested using the Clearview LAM ELISA and Alere LAM strip test. 42% (116/242) of patients had culture-proven TB. 18% (20/54) were sputum scarce. In sputum-scarce patients, the sensitivity of urine MTB/RIF and LAM ELISA was 40% (95%CI: 22-61) and 60% (95%CI: 39-78), respectively. Urine MTB/RIF specificity was 98% (95%CI: 95-100). Combined sensitivity of urine LAM ELISA and MTB/RIF was better than MTB/RIF alone [MTB/RIF and LAM: 70% (95%CI: 48-85) vs. MTB/RIF: 40% (95%CI: 22-61), p = 0.03]. Significant predictors of urine MTB/RIF positivity were CD4<50 cells/ml (p = 0.001), elevated protein-to-creatinine ratio (p<0.001) and LAM ELISA positivity (p<0.001). Urine centrifugation and pelleting significantly increased the sensitivity of MTB/RIF over unprocessed urine in paired samples [42% (95%CI: 26-58) vs. 8% (95%CI: 0-16), p<0.001]. Urine MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values correlated poorly with markers of bacillary burden (smear grade and time-to-positivity).This preliminary study indicates that urine-based MTB/RIF, alone or in combination with LAM antigen detection, may potentially aid the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients with advanced immunosuppression when sputum-based diagnosis is not possible. Concentration of urine prior to MTB/RIF-testing significantly improves sensitivity.Urine lipoarabinomannan assay for tuberculosis screening before antiretroviral therapy diagnostic yield and association with immune reconstitution disease.To assess the utility of urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) detection as a diagnostic screening test for tuberculosis (TB) in HIV-infected patients with advanced immuno deficiency and high prevalence of sputum smear-negative pulmonary disease.Cross-sectional survey.Unselected adults enrolling for antiretroviral therapy (ART) in a South African clinic were screened for TB with two sputum samples for fluorescence microscopy and mycobacterial liquid culture. LAM was measured in urine samples using a commercially available enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.Sputum culture-positive TB was diagnosed in 58 patients (median CD4 cell count=78 cells/microliter) out of 235 patients screened (TB prevalence=0.25). Cultures were identified as positive after a mean of 24 days (SD=9 days). The sensitivity of sputum microscopy was just 0.14 (specificity=1.00), whereas that of LAM in concentrated urine was 0.38 (P<0.01; specificity=1.00). In those with CD4 cell counts of less than 50, 50-100 and more than 150 cells/microliter, the LAM assay sensitivities were 0.67, 0.41 and 0.13, respectively. Corresponding values for the combined use of the LAM assay and microscopy were 0.67, 0.53 and 0.21, respectively. Among TB patients, detectable LAM was very strongly associated with low CD4 cell counts and advanced clinical stage. All patients who developed TB immune reconstitution disease (n=5) had detectable urinary LAM at baseline.The LAM assay has substantially superior sensitivity to sputum microscopy as a routine diagnostic TB screening test among patients with CD4 cell counts less than 100 cells/microliter. In one half of such patients, this assay could reduce the mean time to diagnosis by approximately 3 weeks. Furthermore, detectable urinary LAM may predict the development of TB immune reconstitution disease.Predictive value of anemia for tuberculosis in HIV-infected patients in Sub-Saharan Africa: an indication for routine microbiological investigation using new rapid assays.The relationship between anemia and undiagnosed tuberculosis (TB) in patients living with HIV in sub-Saharan Africa is incompletely defined. We assessed the prevalence of TB among those with HIV-related anemia and evaluated new means of rapid TB diagnosis.Blood hemoglobin levels were measured in unselected antiretroviral treatment-naive patients in Cape Town, South Africa, and anemia was classified according to World Health Organization criteria. All patients were screened for TB by testing paired sputum samples using liquid culture (reference standard), fluorescence microscopy, and Xpert MTB/RIF. Urine samples were tested for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) using the Determine TB-LAM diagnostic assay.Of 602 adults screened, 485 had complete results. Normal hemoglobin levels were found in 44.5% (n = 216) of patients, and mild, moderate, or severe anemia were present in 24.9% (n = 121), 25.4% (n = 123) and 5.2% (n = 25) of patients, respectively. Culture-confirmed pulmonary TB was diagnosed in 8.8% (19/216) of those without anemia compared with 16.5% (20/121), 26.0% (32/123), and 40.0% (10/25) among those with mild, moderate, or severe anemia, respectively (P < 0.001). Anemia was a strong independent predictor of TB. The sensitivities of diagnostic assays were much higher among those with moderate/severe anemia compared with those with no/mild anemia using sputum microscopy (42.9% vs 15.4%), urine LAM (54.8% vs 0%), sputum microscopy plus urine LAM (71.4% vs 15.4%), and sputum Xpert (73.8% vs 41.0%) (P < 0.01 for all).A very high prevalence of undiagnosed TB was found in patients with moderate or severe anemia. Such patients should be prioritized for routine microbiological investigation using rapid diagnostic assays.Clinical utility of a commercial LAM-ELISA assay for TB diagnosis in HIV-infected patients using urine and sputum samples.The accurate diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients, particularly with advanced immunosuppression, is difficult. Recent studies indicate that a lipoarabinomannan (LAM) assay (Clearview-TB(R)-ELISA) may have some utility for the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients; however, the precise subgroup that may benefit from this technology requires clarification. The utility of LAM in sputum samples has, hitherto, not been evaluated.LAM was measured in sputum and urine samples obtained from 500 consecutively recruited ambulant patients, with suspected TB, from 2 primary care clinics in South Africa. Culture positivity for M. tuberculosis was used as the reference standard for TB diagnosis.Of 440 evaluable patients 120/387 (31%) were HIV-infected. Urine-LAM positivity was associated with HIV positivity (p = 0.007) and test sensitivity, although low, was significantly higher in HIV-infected compared to uninfected patients (21% versus 6%; p<0.001), and also in HIV-infected participants with a CD4 <200 versus >200 cells/mm(3) (37% versus 0%; p = 0.003). Urine-LAM remained highly specific in all 3 subgroups (95%-100%). 25% of smear-negative but culture-positive HIV-infected patients with a CD4 <200 cells/mm(3) were positive for urine-LAM. Sputum-LAM had good sensitivity (86%) but poor specificity (15%) likely due to test cross-reactivity with several mouth-residing organisms including actinomycetes and nocardia species.These preliminary data indicate that in a high burden primary care setting the diagnostic usefulness of urine-LAM is limited, as a rule-in test, to a specific patient subgroup i.e. smear-negative HIV-infected TB patients with a CD4 count <200 cells/mm(3), who would otherwise have required further investigation. However, even in this group sensitivity was modest. Future and adequately powered studies in a primary care setting should now specifically target patients with suspected TB who have advanced HIV infection.Low sensitivity of a urine LAM-ELISA in the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis.The development and evaluation of rapid and accurate new diagnostic tools is essential to improve tuberculosis (TB) control in developing countries. In a previous study, the first release of a urine LAM-ELISA by Chemogen (Portland, USA) has been evaluated with a promising sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of pulmonary TB. In the present study, the now commercially available assay has been clinically assessed regarding its diagnostic value alone and in combination with clinical co-factors.The test was applied to two urine samples from 291 consecutively enrolled Tanzanian patients with suspected pulmonary tuberculosis. The participants were subsequently assigned to classification groups according to microbiological, clinical and radiological findings at recruitment and during a maximum follow up period of 56 days.Only 35 out of 69 pulmonary TB cases -confirmed by smear microscopy and/or solid culture and/or liquid culture- showed at least one positive LAM-ELISA result (sensitivity 50.7%). The sensitivity was noticeably higher in females (66.7%) and in HIV positive participants (62.0%). The specificity amounted to 87.8% and was determined in participants with negative results in all microbiological tests and with sustained recovery under antibiotic treatment at day 56. Correlation with urinalysis revealed that proteinuria was significantly and positively associated with LAM-positivity (P = 0.026).This commercially available generation of LAM-ELISA does not appear to be useful as an independent diagnostic test for pulmonary tuberculosis. The question whether the assay is suitable as a supplemental device in the diagnosis of HIV-associated TB, requires further investigations.Cost utility of lateral-flow urine lipoarabinomannan for tuberculosis diagnosis in HIV-infected African adults.In-patient hospitals in South Africa and Uganda.To evaluate the cost-effectiveness of a lateral-flow urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test when added to existing strategies for tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis in human immunodeficiency virus infected adults (CD4(+) T-cell counts < 100 cells/l) with symptoms of active TB.Decision-analytic cost-utility model, with the primary outcome being the incremental cost-effectiveness ratio, expressed in 2010 US dollars per disability-adjusted life year (DALY) averted from the perspective of a public sector TB control program.For every 1000 patients tested, adding lateral-flow urine LAM generated 80 incremental appropriate anti-tuberculosis treatments and averted 224 DALYs. Estimated cost utility was US$353 per DALY averted (95% uncertainty range $192$1161) in South Africa and $86 per DALY averted (95% uncertainty range $49$239) in Uganda, reflecting the lower treatment costs in Uganda. Cost utility was most sensitive to assay specificity, cost of anti-tuberculosis treatment, life expectancy after TB cure and cohort TB prevalence, but did not rise above $1500 per DALY averted in South Africa under any one-way sensitivity analysis. The probability of acceptability was >99.8% at a per-DALY willingness-to-pay threshold equal to the per capita gross domestic product in South Africa ($7275) and Uganda ($509).Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan strip-test for TB detection in HIV-infected hospitalised patients.Lack of point-of-care tests for tuberculosis (TB) result in diagnostic delay, and increased mortality and healthcare-related costs. The urine Determine(TM) TB-LAM point-of-care strip-test was evaluated in 335 prospectively-recruited hospitalised patients with suspected TB-HIV co-infection (group 1) and from 88 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with non-TB diagnoses (group 2). Cut-off point-specific analyses were performed using: 1) a microbiological reference standard (culture positive versus negative); and 2) a composite reference standard (exclusion of patients with clinical-TB from the culture-negative group). Using the microbiological reference and the manufacturer-recommended grade-1 cut-off point, LAM sensitivity and specificity was 66% (95% CI 57-74%). By contrast, using the composite reference sensitivity was 60% (95% CI 53-67%) and specificity improved to 96% (95% CI 89-100%) (p=0.001). The same pattern was seen when the grade-2 cut-off point was used (specificity 75% versus 96%; p=0.01). In group two patients specificity was poor using the grade-1 cut-off point, but improved significantly when the grade-2 cut-off point was used (90% versus 99%; p=0.009). The grade-2 cut-off point also offered superior inter-reader reliability (p=0.002). Sensitivity was highest in those with a CD4 <200 cells per mL. LAM combined with smear-microscopy was able to rule-in TB in 71% of Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture-positive patients. This preliminary study indicates that the LAM strip-test may be a potentially useful rapid rule-in test for TB in hospitalised patients with advanced immunosuppression. The grade 2, but not the manufacturer-recommended grade 1 cut-off point, offered superior rule-in utility and inter-reader reliability. Larger studies to evaluate cut-off points and diagnostic accuracy are urgently required.Comparative performance of urinary lipoarabinomannan assays and Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected individuals.Xpert MTB/RIF ('Xpert') and urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) assays offer rapid tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis, but have suboptimal sensitivity when used individually in HIV-positive patients. The yield of these tests used in combination for the diagnosis of active TB among HIV-infected TB suspects is unknown.Study of comparative diagnostic accuracy nested into a prospective study of HIV-infected individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TB in Uganda.Xpert testing of archived sputum was conducted for culture-confirmed TB cases and TB suspects in whom a diagnosis of TB was excluded. Additional testing included sputum smear microscopy, sputum culture (solid and liquid media), mycobacterial blood culture, and urinary testing for LAM using a lateral flow test ('LF-LAM') and an enzyme-linked immunosorbance assay ('ELISA-LAM').Among 103 participants with culture-confirmed TB, sensitivity of Xpert was 76% (95% confidence interval, CI 0.66-0.84), and was superior to that of LF-LAM (49%, 95% CI 0.39-0.59, P < 0.001). Specificity was greater than 97% for both tests among 105 individuals without TB. The combination of smear microscopy and LF-LAM identified 67% (95% CI 0.57-0.76) of culture-confirmed TB cases and approached sensitivity of Xpert testing alone (P = 0.15). The sensitivity of the combination of Xpert and LF-LAM was 85% (88/103 95% CI 0.77-0.92), which was superior to either test alone (P < 0.05) and approached sensitivity of sputum liquid culture testing (94%, 95% CI 0.88-0.98, P = 0.17).Sputum Xpert and urinary LAM assays were complementary for the diagnosis of active TB in HIV-infected patients, and sensitivity of the combination of these tests was superior to that of either test alone.Rapid diagnosis of tuberculosis by detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan in urine.There is an urgent need for improved tools for laboratory diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB). Here, we describe two methods, a catch-up ELISA and a dipstick test based on the detection in urine of lipoarabinomannan (LAM). LAM is a major and specific glycolipid component of the outer mycobacterial cell wall. Preliminary experiments showed that LAM is excreted in the urine of mice injected intraperitoneally with a crude cell wall preparation of Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Both methods were highly sensitive, detecting LAM at concentrations of 1 ng/ml and 5 pg/ml, respectively. Of 15 patients with active TB, all showed intermediate to high levels of LAM in their urine (absorbance values from 0.3 to 1.2, mean 0.74). Only one sample showed an absorbance value below the chosen cut off value of 0.4. All but one of the urine samples from 26 healthy nursing workers exhibited OD value below 0.4 cut off. These methods may prove valuable for rapid and simple diagnosis of TB in particular in developing countries lacking biosafety level 3 (BSL3) facilities.Clinical significance of lipoarabinomannan detection in urine using a low-cost point-of-care diagnostic assay for HIV-associated tuberculosis.A low-cost point-of-care urine assay for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) used for screening patients prior to antiretroviral therapy (ART) rapidly diagnoses a proportion of tuberculosis (TB) cases. We determined the characteristics and outcomes of such patients.Adults enrolling in a South African township ART clinic were systematically screened for pulmonary TB by testing paired sputum samples using microscopy, liquid culture and Xpert MTB/RIF in a centralized laboratory. Stored urine samples were retrospectively tested for LAM using the Determine TB-LAM assay, but results did not inform treatment. Patients were followed up in the routine ART service and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined. Analysis was restricted to those with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl.Of patients with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl and complete results (n=325), 59 (18.2%) had culture-positive TB. Of these, 23 (39%) patients tested urine LAM-positive and 36 (61%) urine LAM-negative. Patients with LAM-positive TB had much lower CD4 cell counts, higher plasma viral loads, lower haemoglobin concentrations and lower BMIs compared to those with LAM-negative TB. They also had evidence of higher mycobacterial load, more frequently testing sputum smear-positive, Xpert-positive (sputum and urine) and having a shorter time to sputum culture positivity. Of five (8.5%) patients who died, four did so before TB treatment was started. All five retrospectively tested LAM-positive.A low-cost point-of-care urine test for LAM rapidly diagnoses a sub-group of cases with advanced HIV-associated TB and poor prognosis. If used in combination with laboratory-based diagnostics, treatment delays would decrease and survival might be improved.Diagnosis of tuberculosis by a visually detectable immunoassay for lipoarabinomannan.Recovery of tubercle bacilli from sputum, tissue, or body fluid is the standard for the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB) although this process is technically demanding and relatively insensitive. We have developed a simplified, visually detectable, colloidal gold-based serological assay to qualitatively detect IgG directed against the mycobacterial cell wall component lipoarabinomannan (LAM). The objective of this investigation is to determine the accuracy of this assay in patients with active pulmonary TB and in control patients with or without latent infection. In patients with active TB, the sensitivity of anti-LAM IgG was 85 to 93%. In five patients with active TB who were smear-negative, all tested positive for anti-LAM IgG. The specificity of the test depended on the presence of tuberculous infection. In U.S. citizens comprised of young healthy adults and rheumatology patients, the specificity was 100%. In an at-risk population for tuberculous infection who were either tuberculin skin test-negative or positive, the specificity was 89%. The negative and positive predictive values of the test were 98% and 52%, respectively. We conclude that anti-LAM IgG immunoassay is relatively sensitive and specific for active TB and thus, a potentially useful screening test for active TB.Diagnostic accuracy of a point-of-care urine test for tuberculosis screening among newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults: a prospective, clinic-based study.A rapid diagnostic test for active tuberculosis (TB) at the clinical point-of-care could expedite case detection and accelerate TB treatment initiation. We assessed the diagnostic accuracy of a rapid urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test for TB screening among HIV-infected adults in a TB-endemic setting.We prospectively enrolled newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults (≥18 years) at 4 outpatient clinics in Durban from Oct 2011-May 2012, excluding those on TB therapy. A physician evaluated all participants and offered CD4 cell count testing. Trained study nurses collected a sputum sample for acid-fast bacilli smear microscopy (AFB) and mycobacterial culture, and performed urine LAM testing using Determine™ TB LAM in the clinic. The presence of a band regardless of intensity on the urine LAM test was considered positive. We defined as the gold standard for active pulmonary TB a positive sputum culture for Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Diagnostic accuracy of urine LAM was assessed, alone and in combination with smear microscopy, and stratified by CD4 cell count.Among 342 newly-diagnosed HIV-infected participants, 190 (56%) were male, mean age was 35.6 years, and median CD4 was 182/mm3. Sixty participants had culture-positive pulmonary TB, resulting in an estimated prevalence of 17.5% (95% CI 13.7-22.0%). Forty-five (13.2%) participants were urine LAM positive. Mean time from urine specimen collection to LAM test result was 40 minutes (95% CI 34-46 minutes). Urine LAM test sensitivity was 28.3% (95% CI 17.5-41.4) overall, and 37.5% (95% CI 21.1-56.3) for those with CD4 count <100/mm3, while specificity was 90.1% (95% CI 86.0-93.3) overall, and 86.9% (95% CI 75.8-94.2) for those with CD4 < 100/mm3. When combined with sputum AFB (either test positive), sensitivity increased to 38.3% (95% CI 26.0-51.8), but specificity decreased to 85.8% (95% CI 81.1-89.7).In this prospective, clinic-based study with trained nurses, a rapid urine LAM test had low sensitivity for TB screening among newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults, but improved sensitivity when combined with sputum smear microscopy.Value of urine lipoarabinomannan grade and second test for optimizing clinic-based screening for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis.We assessed the role of urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) grade and a second LAM test for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) screening in outpatient clinics in South Africa.We enrolled newly diagnosed HIV-infected adults (≥18 years) at 4 clinics, excluding those on TB therapy. Participants provided sputum for acid-fast bacilli (AFB) microscopy and culture. Nurses conducted 2 rapid urine LAM tests at the point-of-care and graded positive results from low (faint) to high (5+). Culture-confirmed pulmonary TB was the gold standard. We used area under receiver operating curves (AUROC) to compare screening strategies.Among 320 HIV-infected adults, median CD4 was 248 cells per cubic millimeter (interquartile range, 107-379/mm); 54 (17%) were TB culture positive. Fifty-two (16%) of all participants were LAM positive by either test; correlation between LAM tests was high. Among 10 "faint" positive results, 2 (20%) had culture-positive TB. Using ≥1+ LAM grade as positive, 1 LAM test had sensitivity of 41% [95% confidence interval (CI): 28% to 55%] and specificity of 92% (95% CI: 88% to 95%). A 2 LAM test strategy had a sensitivity of 43% (95% CI: 29% to 57%). One LAM test ≥1+ grade (AUROC = 0.66; 95% CI: 0.60 to 0.73) was significantly better than sputum AFB alone. The optimal strategy was sequentially performing 1 LAM test followed by sputum AFB if LAM grade <1+ (AUROC = 0.70; 95% CI: 0.63 to 0.77), which had sensitivity of 48% (95% CI: 34% to 62%) and specificity of 91% (95% CI: 87% to 94%).In this clinic-based study, "faint" line was a false-positive second urine LAM test added no value, and an optimal screening strategy was 1 LAM test followed by sputum AFB microscopy for urine LAM-negative people.Diagnostic evaluation of urinary lipoarabinomannan at an Ethiopian tuberculosis centre.Direct capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) was performed on urine samples from 200 tuberculosis (TB) patients and 800 non-TB patients routinely diagnosed among consecutive suspects in an Ethiopian TB centre. 50 healthy Ethiopians, 50 healthy individuals and 100 non-TB patients from Norway served as controls. Of the TB patients, 139 (69.5%) were positive for acid-fast bacilli (AFB). In the remaining cases the diagnosis was based on suggestive clinical findings. All Ethiopian non-TB patients were AFB negative and showed no clinical evidence of TB. In the Ethiopian groups, 148 (74%) of the TB patients, 105 (13.1%) of the non-TB patients and 5 (10%) of the healthy controls were positive by the LAM-ELISA. 113 (81.3%) of AFB positives and 35 (57.4%) of AFB-negative TB patients had positive LAM-ELISA. In the Norwegian groups all were LAM negative. The sensitivity and specificity of the LAM-ELISA for TB patients versus Ethiopian non-TB patients were 74% and 86.9%, respectively; the positive and negative predictive values were 58.5% and 93.0%. This study suggests that detection of LAM in the urine of TB patients may improve case finding and that diagnostic tests based on this principle may serve as valuable supplemental tools in TB control.Detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan with an antigen-capture ELISA in unprocessed urine of Tanzanian patients with suspected tuberculosis.A direct antigen-capture ELISA based on the detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in unprocessed urine was evaluated for its usefulness in clinical practice. In Tanzania, 231 patients with suspected pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) and 103 healthy volunteers were screened with standard TB tests and with the new LAM-ELISA. Of 132 patients with confirmed pulmonary mycobacterial disease (positive sputum culture), 106 were positive using the LAM-ELISA (sensitivity 80.3%). In comparison, the sensitivity of acid-fast bacilli (AFB) sputum microscopy was 62.1% (82 of 132 confirmed cases). Of the 231 patients, 17 were both culture- and AFB-negative, but had typical radiographic signs of pulmonary mycobacterial infection and did not respond to antibiotic treatment. Of these 17 patients, 13 (76.5%) had positive LAM-ELISA test results. To define the specificity of the assay, urine samples from 103 healthy volunteers were also screened using LAM-ELISA. All but one had an optical density below the cut-off (specificity 99%). Of interest was a significant correlation between level of microscopic density of mycobacteria in sputum and LAM antigen concentration in urine (chi2=8.44). The LAM-ELISA is a field-adapted tool that can improve screening standards in countries with a high incidence of TB.Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan test for tuberculosis in hospitalized patients in a High HIV prevalence setting.Effective tuberculosis (TB) control in HIV-prevalent settings is hindered by absence of accurate, rapid TB diagnostic tests. We evaluated the accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test for TB diagnosis in South Africa.Hospitalized adults with signs and/or symptoms of active TB were enrolled. Sputum smear microscopy and mycobacterial culture, mycobacterial blood culture, and HIV testing were performed. A spot urine specimen was tested for LAM.Four hundred ninety nine participants were enrolled; 422 (84.6%) were HIV infected. In microbiologically confirmed TB patients, the LAM test was positive in 114 of 193 [sensitivity 59%, (95% confidence interval: 52 to 66)], including 112 of 167 [67% (59 to 74)] who were HIV infected. Among individuals classified as "not TB", the LAM test was negative in 117 of 122 [specificity 96% (91 to 99)], including 83 of 88 [94% (87 to 98)] who were HIV infected. In confirmed TB patients, the LAM test was more sensitive than sputum smear microscopy (42%, 82 of 193, P < 0.001) and detected 56% (62 of 111) of those who were sputum smear negative. HIV infection [adjusted odds ratio (AOR 13.4)], mycobacteremia (AOR 3.21), and positive sputum smear (AOR 2.42) were risk factors for a positive LAM test.The urine LAM test detected a subset of HIV-infected patients with severe TB in whom sputum smear microscopy had suboptimal sensitivity. The combination of urine LAM testing and sputum smear microscopy is attractive for use in settings with high HIV burden.Diagnostic accuracy of induced sputum LAM ELISA for tuberculosis diagnosis in sputum-scarce patients.To examine whether a lipoarabinomannan (LAM) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) that offers diagnostic utility using urine in patients with tuberculosis (TB) and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) co-infection can be used in induced sputum to diagnose sputum-scarce patients with suspected TB.LAM was measured in induced sputum samples obtained from 61 consecutively recruited sputum-scarce TB suspects in a tertiary hospital respiratory clinic in South Africa. Liquid culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis was used as the reference standard. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was used to assess alternative LAM concentration cut-offs.A total of 87% (53/61) of study patients had a valid M. tuberculosis culture result; 49% (23/53) were HIV-infected and 17% (9/53) were culture-positive for M. tuberculosis. Induced sputum smear microscopy and LAM ELISA had an overall sensitivity of 56% (95%CI 27-81); however, the specificity of LAM ELISA was 48% (95%CI 34-62), while the positive and negative predictive values were respectively 18% (95%CI 8-36) and 84% (95%CI 65-94). An optimal rule-in cut-off selected by receiver operating characteristic (LAM concentration >5.73 ng/ml) increased test specificity to 98% and reduced sensitivity to 22%. Normalisation of the assay for sample total protein or cell count did not improve diagnostic accuracy.In this proof-of-concept study, the ELISA was not clinically useful for TB diagnosis using induced sputum.Modification of clearview tuberculosis (TB) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for TB patients not infected with HIV.Diagnosis of active tuberculosis by detection of urinary lipoarabinomannan (uLAM) from Mycobacterium tuberculosis is an attractive approach. Concentrating urine 100-fold allowed quantitation of uLAM at levels equal to picograms/ml of nonconcentrated urine. The approach of concentrating urine 100-fold improved the clinical sensitivity of the Clearview TB enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) from 7% to 57% yet impaired its specificity from 97% to 89%. (This study has been registered at University Hospital of Turku under registration no. 47/180/2009, Helsinki University Central Hospital under 149/2010, University Hospital of Kuopio under 105/2010, and China Medical University Hospital, Taichung, under DMR-99-IRB-075-2.). Blinded evaluation of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan for active tuberculosis: a pilot study.Urine antigen testing is an attractive strategy for the diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB), but accuracy data are scarce.To prospectively evaluate the diagnostic performance of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen testing for active TB among pulmonary and extra-pulmonary TB suspects.Prospective blinded evaluation of 200 adult TB suspects at a tertiary referral hospital in India. Reference standards included culture and clinical diagnosis.Patients were 61% male (mean age 40.4 years): 8.5% were human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infected and 47 of 200 (23.5%) were culture-positive for TB. Compared to positivity on either Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) or BACTEC cultures, LAM sensitivity was 17.8% (95%CI 8.5-32.6), while specificity was 87.7% (95%CI 81.3-92.3). Compared to positivity on both LJ and BACTEC, LAM sensitivity was 5.8% (95%CI 12.5-44.9), with a specificity of 88.8% (95%CI 82.7-92.9). Compared to the clinical diagnosis, LAM sensitivity was 20.0% (95%CI 1.1-70.1), with a specificity of 83.3% (95%CI 50.9-97.0). HIV and smear status did not influence test accuracy.In its current form, LAM is insensitive for the diagnosis of active TB, although its specificity is adequate.Detection of lipoarabinomannan as a diagnostic test for tuberculosis.A coagglutination technique was established for the detection of lipoarabinomannan of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in human serum samples and evaluated for its utility in the diagnosis of tuberculosis at the Instituto Nacional de Enfermedades Respiratorias in Mexico City. The test had a sensitivity of 88% in patients with sputum-smear-positive active pulmonary tuberculosis. The sensitivity in patients with active pulmonary tuberculosis negative for acid-fast bacilli in sputum was 67%. Less favorable results were obtained for patients with AIDS and tuberculosis, with a sensitivity of 57%. The specificity in control patients with lung diseases different from tuberculosis and in healthy subjects was 100%. The positive predictive value was 100%, and the negative predictive value for patients with sputum-positive active pulmonary tuberculosis was 97%. The results of this study suggest that the detection of lipoarabinomannan is an accurate test for the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis.Circulating antibodies to lipoarabinomannan in relation to sputum microscopy, clinical features and urinary anti-lipoarabinomannan detection in pulmonary tuberculosis.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA)-based investigation of anti-lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antibody levels in the sera of patients with acid-fast bacilli (AFB)-positive pulmonary tuberculosis (PTB), AFB-negative PTB and non-TB respiratory tract symptoms was conducted. The anti-LAM results were further evaluated using urine LAM detection and a clinical diagnostic score (DS) system as references. Using sputum AFB as a reference, positive anti-LAM was found in 66.9% of 139 AFB-positive PTB, 34.4% of 61 AFB-negative PTB and 23.5% of 800 non-TB patients and in 8% of 50 healthy individuals. The positive and negative predictive values were 48.7% and 87.4%, respectively. Using the DS as a reference, the sensitivity and specificity were 50.5% and 78.3%, respectively, whereas 45.8% of urine LAM positives and 77.9% of urine LAM negatives were correctly identified by the anti-LAM ELISA. In TB endemic areas a negative anti-LAM could be of practical value, particularly when other indicators of PTB are negative. Using any of these methods as a reference, a positive anti-LAM would mislead in about one-quarter of cases. Had all the 3 methods been combined and at least 2 positive tests sufficed, 90.6% of AFB-positive PTB, 52.5% of AFB-negative PTB and 94.9% of non-TB patients would have been correctly diagnosed. Apart from the possible impact of HIV, the low accuracy of the current assay could be due to intravascular formation of LAM-anti-LAM complexes, latent TB or environmental mycobacterial infections.Reasons for false-positive lipoarabinomannan ELISA results in a Tanzanian population.Lipoarabinomannan (LAM), a cell wall component of mycobacteria, can be detected in the urine of tuberculosis (TB) patients. Advantages of this diagnostic include the ease of sample collection and test methods. However, as with most new TB diagnostics, LAM tests have been evaluated in well-controlled laboratory settings and subsequently need assessment under real working conditions. Our experience showed that the diagnosis of TB using the detection of LAM in urine under field conditions is prone to false-positive results due to contamination. Dust and soil, but also stool, seemed to lead to increased OD values and thus false-positive results of the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for LAM; however, contamination with blood, as well as bacterial or fungal organisms, had no influence. The collection of urine for the detection of LAM should therefore follow strict collection criteria in order to avoid contamination.Test characteristics of urinary lipoarabinomannan and predictors of mortality among hospitalized HIV-infected tuberculosis suspects in Tanzania.Tuberculosis is the most common cause of death among patients with HIV infection living in tuberculosis endemic countries, but many cases are not diagnosed pre-mortem. We assessed the test characteristics of urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) and predictors of mortality among HIV-associated tuberculosis suspects in Tanzania.We prospectively enrolled hospitalized HIV-infected patients in Dar es Salaam, with ≥2 weeks of cough or fever, or weight loss. Subjects gave 2 mLs of urine to test for LAM using a commercially available ELISA, ≥2 sputum specimens for concentrated AFB smear and solid media culture, and 40 mLs of blood for culture.Among 212 evaluable subjects, 143 (68%) were female; mean age was 36 years; and the median CD4 count 86 cells/mm(3). 69 subjects (33%) had culture confirmation of tuberculosis and 65 (31%) were LAM positive. For 69 cases of sputum or blood culture-confirmed tuberculosis, LAM sensitivity was 65% and specificity 86% compared to 36% and 98% for sputum smear. LAM test characteristics were not different in patients with bacteremia but showed higher sensitivity and lower specificity with decreasing CD4 cell count. Two month mortality was 64 (53%) of 121 with outcomes available. In multivariate analysis there was significant association of mortality with absence of anti-retroviral therapy (p = 0.004) and a trend toward association with a positive urine LAM (p = 0.16). Among culture-negative patients mortality was 9 (75%) of 12 in LAM positive patients and 27 (38%) of 71 in LAM negative patients (p = 0.02).Urine LAM is more sensitive than sputum smear and has utility for the rapid diagnosis of culture-confirmed tuberculosis in this high-risk population. Mortality data raise the possibility that urine LAM may also be a marker for culture-negative tuberculosis.Point-of-care lateral flow assays for tuberculosis and cryptococcal antigenuria predict death in HIV infected adults in Uganda.Mortality in hospitalized, febrile patients in Sub-Saharan Africa is high due to HIV-infected, severely immunosuppressed patients with opportunistic co-infection, particularly disseminated tuberculosis (TB) and cryptococcal disease. We sought to determine if a positive lateral flow assay (LFA) result for urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) and cryptococcal antigenuria was associated with mortality.351 hospitalized, HIV-positive adults with symptoms consistent with TB and who were able to provide both urine and sputum specimens were prospectively enrolled at Mulago National Referral Hospital in Uganda as part of a prospective accuracy evaluation of the lateral flow Determine TB LAM test. Stored frozen urine was retrospectively tested for cryptococcal antigen (CRAG) using the LFA. We fitted a multinomial logistic regression model to analyze factors associated with death within 2 months after initial presentation.The median CD4 of the participants was 57 (IQR: 14-179) cells/µl and 41% (145) were microbiologically confirmed TB cases. LAM LFA was positive in 38% (134), 7% (25) were CRAG positive, and 43% (151) were positive for either test in urine. Overall, 21% (75) died within the first 2 months, and a total of 32% (114) were confirmed dead by 6 months. At 2 months, 30% of LAM or CRAG positive patients were confirmed dead compared to 15.0% of those who were negative. In an adjusted model, LAM or CRAG positive results were associated with an increased risk of death (RRR 2.29, 95% CI: 1.29, 4.05; P = 0.005).In hospitalized HIV-infected patients, LAM or CRAG LFA positivity was associated with subsequent death within 2 months. Further studies are warranted to examine the impact of POC diagnostic 'test and treat' approach on patient-centered outcomes.Diagnostic accuracy of a rapid urine lipoarabinomannan test for tuberculosis in HIV-infected adults.In settings of high HIV prevalence, tuberculosis control and patient management are hindered by lack of accurate, rapid tuberculosis diagnostic tests that can be performed at point-of-care. The Determine TB LAM Ag (TB LAM) test is a lateral flow immunochromatographic test for detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine. Our objective was to determine sensitivity and specificity of the TB LAM test for tuberculosis diagnosis.Prospective diagnostic accuracy study.Hospital and outpatient settings in Uganda and South Africa.HIV-infected adults with tuberculosis symptoms and/or signs.Participants provided a fresh urine specimen for TB LAM testing, blood for mycobacterial culture, and 2 respiratory specimens for smear microscopy and mycobacterial culture.For the TB LAM test, sensitivity in participants with culture-positive tuberculosis and specificity in participants without tuberculosis.A total of 1013 participants were enrolled. Among culture-positive tuberculosis patients, the TB LAM test identified 136/367 (37.1%) overall and 116/196 (59.2%) in the group with CD4 ≤100 cells per cubic millimeter. The test was specific in 559/573 (97.6%) patients without tuberculosis. Sensitivity of the urine TB LAM test plus sputum smear microscopy was 197/367 (53.7%) overall and 133/196 (67.9%) among those with CD4 ≤100. CD4 ≤50 [adjusted odds ratio (AOR), 6.2; P < 0.001] or 51-100 (AOR, 7.1; P < 0.001), mycobacteremia (AOR, 6.1; P < 0.01) and hospitalization (AOR, 2.6; P = 0.03) were independently associated with a positive TB LAM test.In HIV-positive adults with CD4 ≤100, the TB LAM urine test detected over half of culture-positive tuberculosis patients, in <30 minutes and without the need for equipment or reagents.Adjunctive tests for diagnosis of tuberculosis: serology, ELISPOT for site-specific lymphocytes, urinary lipoarabinomannan, string test, and fine needle aspiration.The diagnostic gold standard for active tuberculosis (TB) is the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) by culture or molecular methods. However, despite its limited sensitivity, sputum smear microscopy is still the mainstay of TB diagnosis in resource-limited settings. Consequently, diagnosis of smear-negative pulmonary and extrapulmonary TB remains challenging in such settings. A number of novel or alternative techniques could provide adjunctive diagnostic use in the context of difficult-to-diagnose TB. These may be especially useful in certain patient groups such as persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and children, who are disproportionably affected by smear-negative and extrapulmonary disease and who are also most adversely affected by delays in TB diagnosis and treatment. We review a selection of these methods that are independent of nucleic acid amplification techniques and could largely be implemented in resource-limited settings in current or adapted versions. Specifically, we discuss the diagnostic use and potential of serologic tests based on detection of antibodies to MTB antigens; interferon gamma release assays using site-specific lymphocytes; detection of lipoarabinomannan, a glycolipid of MTB, in urine; the string test, a novel technique to retrieve lower respiratory tract samples; and fine needle aspiration biopsy of lymph nodes.Can point-of-care urine LAM strip testing for tuberculosis add value to clinical decision making in hospitalised HIV-infected persons?The urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) strip-test (Determine®-TB) can rapidly rule-in TB in HIV-infected persons with advanced immunosuppression. However, given high rates of empiric treatment amongst hospitalised patients in high-burden settings (≈ 50%) it is unclear whether LAM can add any value to clinical decision making, or identify a subset of patients with unfavourable outcomes that would otherwise have been missed by empiric treatment.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with suspected TB received urine LAM strip testing, and were categorised as definite (culture-positive), probable-, or non-TB. Both the proportion and morbidity of TB cases identified by LAM testing, early empiric treatment (initiated prior to test result availability) and a set of clinical predictors were compared across groups.187/281 patients had either definite- (n = 116) or probable-TB (n = 71). As a rule-in test for definite and probable-TB, LAM identified a similar proportion of TB cases compared to early empiric treatment (85/187 vs. 93/187, p = 0.4), but a greater proportion than classified by a set of clinical predictors alone (19/187; p<0.001). Thirty-nine of the 187 (21%) LAM-positive patients who had either definite- or probable-TB were missed by early empiric treatment, and of these 25/39 (64%) would also have been missed by smear microscopy. Thus, 25/187 (8%) of definite- or probable-TB patients with otherwise delayed initiation of TB treatment could be detected by the LAM strip test. LAM-positive patients missed by early empiric treatment had a lower median CD4 count (p = 0.008), a higher median illness severity score (p = 0.001) and increased urea levels (p = 0.002) compared to LAM-negative patients given early empiric treatment.LAM strip testing outperformed TB diagnosis based on clinical criteria but in day-to-day practice identified a similar proportion of patients compared to early empiric treatment. However, compared to empiric treatment, LAM identified a different subset of patients with more advanced immunosuppression and greater disease severity.Comparison of a clinical prediction rule and a LAM antigen-detection assay for the rapid diagnosis of TBM in a high HIV prevalence setting.The diagnosis of tuberculous meningitis (TBM) in resource poor TB endemic environments is challenging. The accuracy of current tools for the rapid diagnosis of TBM is suboptimal. We sought to develop a clinical-prediction rule for the diagnosis of TBM in a high HIV prevalence setting, and to compare performance outcomes to conventional diagnostic modalities and a novel lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen detection test (Clearview-TB®) using cerebrospinal fluid (CSF).Patients with suspected TBM were classified as definite-TBM (CSF culture or PCR positive), probable-TBM and non-TBM.Of the 150 patients, 84% were HIV-infected (median [IQR] CD4 count = 132 [54; 241] cells/µl). There were 39, 55 and 54 patients in the definite, probable and non-TBM groups, respectively. The LAM sensitivity and specificity (95%CI) was 31% (17;48) and 94% (85;99), respectively (cut-point ≥ 0.18). By contrast, smear-microscopy was 100% specific but detected none of the definite-TBM cases. LAM positivity was associated with HIV co-infection and low CD4 T cell count (CD4<200 vs. >200 cells/µl; p = 0.03). The sensitivity and specificity in those with a CD4<100 cells/µl was 50% (27;73) and 95% (74;99), respectively. A clinical-prediction rule ≥ 6 derived from multivariate analysis had a sensitivity and specificity (95%CI) of 47% (31;64) and 98% (90;100), respectively. When LAM was combined with the clinical-prediction-rule, the sensitivity increased significantly (p<0.001) to 63% (47;68) and specificity remained high at 93% (82;98).Despite its modest sensitivity the LAM ELISA is an accurate rapid rule-in test for TBM that has incremental value over smear-microscopy. The rule-in value of LAM can be further increased by combination with a clinical-prediction rule, thus enhancing the rapid diagnosis of TBM in HIV-infected persons with advanced immunosuppression.Clinical diagnostic utility of IP-10 and LAM antigen levels for the diagnosis of tuberculous pleural effusions in a high burden setting.Current tools for the diagnosis of tuberculosis pleural effusions are sub-optimal. Data about the value of new diagnostic technologies are limited, particularly, in high burden settings. Preliminary case control studies have identified IFN-gamma-inducible-10 kDa protein (IP-10) as a promising diagnostic marker; however, its diagnostic utility in a day-to-day clinical setting is unclear. Detection of LAM antigen has not previously been evaluated in pleural fluid.We investigated the comparative diagnostic utility of established (adenosine deaminase [ADA]), more recent (standardized nucleic-acid-amplification-test [NAAT]) and newer technologies (a standardized LAM mycobacterial antigen-detection assay and IP-10 levels) for the evaluation of pleural effusions in 78 consecutively recruited South African tuberculosis suspects. All consenting participants underwent pleural biopsy unless contra-indicated or refused. The reference standard comprised culture positivity for M. tuberculosis or histology suggestive of tuberculosis.Of 74 evaluable subjects 48, 7 and 19 had definite, probable and non-TB, respectively. IP-10 levels were significantly higher in TB vs non-TB participants (p<0.0001). The respective outcomes [sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV %] for the different diagnostic modalities were: ADA at the 30 IU/L cut-point [96; 69; 90; 85], NAAT [6; 93; 67; 28], IP-10 at the 28,170 pg/ml ROC-derived cut-point [80; 82; 91; 64], and IP-10 at the 4035 pg/ml cut-point [100; 53; 83; 100]. Thus IP-10, using the ROC-derived cut-point, missed approximately 20% of TB cases and mis-diagnosed approximately 20% of non-TB cases. By contrast, when a lower cut-point was used a negative test excluded TB. The NAAT had a poor sensitivity but high specificity. LAM antigen-detection was not diagnostically useful.Although IP-10, like ADA, has sub-optimal specificity, it may be a clinically useful rule-out test for tuberculous pleural effusions. Larger multi-centric studies are now required to confirm our findings.Point-of-care detection of lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine for diagnosis of HIV-associated tuberculosis: a state of the art review.Detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis antigens in urine is attractive as a potential means of diagnosing tuberculosis (TB) regardless of the anatomical site of disease. The most promising candidate antigen is the cell wall lipopolysaccharide antigen lipoarabinomannan (LAM), which has been used to develop commercially available enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. Although highly variable diagnostic accuracy has been observed in different clinical populations, it is now clear that this assay has useful sensitivity for diagnosis of HIV-associated TB in patients with advanced immunodeficiency and low CD4 cell counts. Thus, this assay is particularly useful when selectively used among patients enrolling in antiretroviral treatment services or in HIV-infected patients requiring admission to hospital medical wards. These are the very patients who have the highest mortality risk and who stand to gain the most from rapid diagnosis, permitting immediate initiation of TB treatment. A recently developed low-cost, lateral-flow (urine 'dip-stick') format of the assay provides a result within 30 minutes and is potentially a major step forward as it can be used at the point-of-care, making the possibility of immediate diagnosis and treatment a reality. This paper discusses the likely utility of this point-of-care assay and how it might best be used in combination with other diagnostic assays for TB. The many further research studies that are needed on this assay are described. Consideration is particularly given to potential reasons for the variable specificity observed in existing field evaluations of LAM ELISAs. Whether this might be related to the assay itself or to the challenges associated with study design is discussed.Urinary lipoarabinomannan as predictor for the tuberculosis immune reconstitution inflammatory syndrome.Upon initiation of antiretroviral therapy (ART), 15.7% [95% confidence interval (CI): 9.7% to 24.5%] of tuberculosis (TB)-HIV-coinfected individuals experience paradoxical worsening of their clinical status with exuberant inflammation consistent with immune reconstitution inflammatory syndrome (IRIS). We investigated whether a positive urinary TB lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test before ART initiation was associated with development of paradoxical TB-IRIS.In a prospective observational cohort in Mulago Hospital, Kampala, Uganda, we measured pre-ART urinary LAM concentrations in HIV-infected patients on TB treatment. Patients who developed TB-IRIS (according to the International Network for the Study of HIV-associated IRIS case definition) were compared with patients who remained IRIS free for at least 3 months.Twenty-six individuals with TB-IRIS and 64 without IRIS were included in the analysis. The median time to TB-IRIS was 14 days (interquartile range: 11-14 days). Univariate analysis showed that a positive pre-ART urinary LAM test [OR: 4.6 (95% CI: 1.5 to 13.8), P = 0.006] and a CD4 count <50 cells/mL [OR: 21 (95% CI: 2.6 to 169.4), P = 0.004] were associated with an increased risk of TB-IRIS. In multivariate analysis, only a baseline CD4 T-cell count <50 cells/mL was predictive of IRIS (P < 0.004). Sensitivity and specificity of a positive pre-ART urinary LAM test to diagnose IRIS were 80.8% (95% CI: 60.6 to 93.4) and 52.4% (95% CI: 39.4 to 65.1), respectively.If CD4 T-cell count testing is available, a pre-highly active antiretroviral therapy urinary LAM test has no added value to predict TB-IRIS. When CD4 T-cell count is not available, a positive LAM test could identify patients at increased risk of TB-IRIS.Diagnostic accuracy of a low-cost, urine antigen, point-of-care screening assay for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis before antiretroviral therapy: a descriptive study.The diagnostic accuracy of sputum smear microscopy and routine chest radiology for HIV-associated tuberculosis is poor, and culture-based diagnosis is slow, expensive, and is unavailable in most resource-limited settings. We assessed the diagnostic accuracy of a urine antigen test Determine TB-LAM Ag (Determine TB-LAM; Alere, Waltham, MA, USA) for screening for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis before antiretroviral therapy (ART).In this descriptive study, consecutive adults referred to a community-based ART clinic in Gugulethu township, South Africa, were all screened for tuberculosis by obtaining sputum samples for fluorescence microscopy, automated liquid culture (gold-standard test), and Xpert MTB/RIF assays (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) and urine samples for the Clearview TB-ELISA (TB-ELISA; Alere, Waltham, MA, USA) and Determine TB-LAM test. Patients with Mycobacterium tuberculosis cultured from one or more sputum samples were defined as cases of tuberculosis. The diagnostic accuracy of Determine TB-LAM used alone or combined with sputum smear microscopy was compared with that of sputum culture and the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for all patients and subgroups of patients stratified by CD4 cell count.Patients were recruited between March 12, 2010, and April 20, 2011. Of 602 patients enrolled, 542 were able to provide one or more sputum samples, and 94 had culture-positive tuberculosis (prevalence 17·4%, 95% CI 14·2-20·8). Complete results from all tests were available for 516 patients (median CD4 count, 169·5 cells per μL; IQR 100-233), including 85 culture-positive tuberculosis, 24 of whom (28·2%, 95% CI 19·0-39·0) had sputum smear-positive disease. Determine TB-LAM test strips provided results within 30 min. Agreement was very high between two independent readers of the test strips (κ=0·97) and between the test strips and TB-ELISA (κ=0·84). Determine TB-LAM had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66·7% (95% CI 41·0-86·7) at <50 cells per μL, 51·7% (32·5-70·6) at <100 cells per μL, and 39·0% (26·5-52·6) at <200 cells per μL; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. When combined with smear microscopy (either test positive), sensitivity was 72·2% (95% CI 46·5-90·3) at CD4 counts less than 50 cells per μL, 65·5% (45·7-82·1) at less than 100 cells per μL, and 52·5% (39·1-65·7) at less than 200 cells per μL, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost, alternative to existing diagnostic assays for tuberculosis screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4 cell counts and provides important incremental yield when combined with sputum smear microscopy.Wellcome Trust.Antigen detection as a point-of-care test for TB: the case of lipoarabinomannan.The limitations of sputum smear microscopy, routine chest radiology for HIV-associated TB and culture-based diagnosis are well recognized, especially in resource-limited settings. The diagnostic accuracy of a new point-of-care lateral-flow urine strip test for lipoarabinomannan (Determine(®) TB-LAM; Alere, MA, USA), which costs US$3.50 per test strip and provides results within 30 min, was evaluated in a cohort of South African patients for HIV-associated TB before starting anti-retroviral therapy in South Africa. Prevalence of culture-positive TB cases was 17.4%, among which 28.2% had sputum smear positivity. Determine(®) TB-LAM (Alere, MA, USA) had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66.7, 51.7 and 39.0% at <50 cells, <100 cells and <200 cells per µl, respectively; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. There was an incremental sensitivity when Determine TB-LAM was combined with smear microscopy, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF (Cepheid; CA, USA) assay. Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost alternative to existing diagnostic assays for TB screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4(+) cell counts.Utility of a novel lipoarabinomannan assay for the diagnosis of tuberculous meningitis in a resource-poor high-HIV prevalence setting.In Africa, tuberculous meningitis (TBM) is an important opportunistic infection in HIV-positive patients. Current diagnostic tools for TBM perform sub-optimally. In particular, the rapid diagnosis of TBM is challenging because smear microscopy has a low yield and PCR is not widely available in resource-poor settings.We evaluated the performance outcome of a novel standardized lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen-detection assay, using archived cerebrospinal fluid samples, in 50 African TBM suspects of whom 68% were HIV-positive.Of the 50 participants 14, 23 and 13 patients had definite, probable and non-TBM, respectively. In the non-TB group there were 5 HIV positive patients who were lost to follow-up and in whom concomitant infection with Mycobacterium tuberculosis could not be definitively excluded. The test sensitivities and specificities were as follows: LAM assay 64% and 69% (cut-point 0.22), smear microscopy 0% and 100% and PCR 93% and 77%, respectively.In this preliminary proof-of-concept study, a rapid diagnosis of TBM could be achieved using LAM antigen detection. Although specificity was sub-optimal, the estimates provided here may be unreliable because of a classification bias inherent in the study design where it was not possible to exclude TBM in the presumed non-TBM cases owing to a lack of clinical follow-up. As PCR is largely unavailable, the LAM assay may well prove to be a useful adjunct for the rapid diagnosis of TBM in high HIV-incidence settings. These preliminary results justify further enquiry and prospective studies are now required to definitively establish the place of this technology for the diagnosis of TBM.Single-molecule detection on a protein-array assay platform for the exposure of a tuberculosis antigen.Based on a single-molecule sensitive fluorescence-linked immunosorbent assay, an analytical platform for the detection of lipoarabinomannan (LAM), a lipopolysaccharide marker of tuberculosis, was established that is about 3 orders of magnitude more sensitive than comparable current ELISA assays. No amplification step was required. Also, no particular sample preparation had to be done. Since individual binding events are detected, true quantification was possible simply by counting individual signals. Utilizing a total internal reflection configuration, unprocessed biological samples (human urine and plasma) to which LAM was added could be analyzed without the requirement of sample purification or washing steps during analysis. Samples containing about 600 antigen molecules per microliter produced a distinct signal. The methodology developed can be employed for any set of target molecules for which appropriate antibodies exist.Prognostic value of a quantitative analysis of lipoarabinomannan in urine from patients with HIV-associated tuberculosis.Detection of the mycobacterial cell wall antigen lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine can be used to diagnose HIV-associated tuberculosis (TB) using a qualitative (positive/negative) read-out. However, it is not known whether the quantity of LAM present in urine provides additional prognostic information.Consecutively recruited adult outpatients initiating antiretroviral therapy (ART) in South Africa were investigated for TB regardless of clinical symptoms using sputum smear microscopy and liquid culture (reference standard). Urine samples were tested using the Clearview TB-ELISA for LAM and the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. The ELISA optical densities (OD) were used as a quantitative assessment of urine LAM. Among 514 patients with complete sputum and urine LAM OD results, culture-confirmed TB was diagnosed in 84 patients. Twenty-three (27.3%) were LAM-positive with a median LAM OD of 0.68 (IQR 0.16-2.43; range, 0.10-3.29) and 61 (72.6%) were LAM negative (LAM OD <0.1 above background). Higher LAM ODs were associated with a range of prognostic indices, including lower CD4 cell counts, lower haemoglobin levels, higher blood neutrophil counts and higher mycobacterial load as assessed using both sputum and urine samples. The median LAM OD among patients who died was more than 6.8-fold higher than that of patients who remained alive at 3 months (P<0.001). The small number of deaths, however, precluded adequate assessment of mortality risk stratified according to urine LAM OD.In patients with HIV-associated TB, concentrations of LAM in urine were strongly associated with a range of poor prognostic characteristics known to be associated with mortality risk. Urine LAM assays with a semi-quantitative (negative vs. low-positive vs. high-positive) read-out may have improved clinical utility over assays with a simple binary result.HIV-associated tuberculosis: relationship between disease severity and the sensitivity of new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic assays.Reducing mortality from HIV-associated tuberculosis (TB) requires diagnostic tools that are rapid and have high sensitivity among patients with poor prognosis. We determined the relationship between disease severity and the sensitivity of new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic assays.Consecutive ambulatory patients enrolling for antiretroviral treatment in South Africa were screened for TB regardless of symptoms using diagnostic assays prospectively applied to sputum (fluorescence smear microscopy, Xpert MTB/RIF and liquid culture (reference standard)) and retrospectively applied to stored urine samples (Determine TB-LAM and Xpert MTB/RIF). Assay sensitivities were calculated stratified according to pre-defined indices of disease severity: CD4 count, symptom intensity, serum C-reactive protein (CRP), hemoglobin concentration and vital status at 90 days.Sputum culture-positive TB was diagnosed in 15% (89/602) of patients screened and data from 86 patients were analyzed (median CD4 count, 131 cells/μL) including 6 (7%) who died. The sensitivity of sputum microscopy was 26.7% overall and varied relatively little with disease severity. In marked contrast, the sensitivities of urine-based and sputum-based diagnosis using Determine TB-LAM and Xpert MTB/RIF assays were substantially greater in sub-groups with poorer prognosis. Rapid diagnosis from sputum and/or urine samples was possible in >80% of patients in sub-groups with poor prognosis as defined by either CD4 counts <100 cells/μL, advanced symptoms, CRP concentrations >200 mg/L or hemoglobin <8.0 g/dl. Retrospective testing of urine samples with Determine TB-LAM correctly identified all those with TB who died.The sensitivities of Xpert MTB/RIF and Determine TB-LAM for HIV-associated TB were highest among HIV-infected patients with the most advanced disease and poorest prognostic characteristics. These data provide strong justification for large-scale intervention studies that assess the impact on survival of screening using these new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic approaches.Diagnostic accuracy of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan detection in African tuberculosis suspects and patients.To evaluate a commercially available antigen capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) based on detecting lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine for the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB).Consenting TB suspects and registering TB patients prospectively recruited from three hospitals were asked for two sputum specimens for microscopy and culture, urine for LAM testing and blood for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) testing, with radiological and clinical follow-up for 2 months.Of 427 participants, complete data were available from 397 (307 adult and 23 adolescent TB suspects, and 67 registering TB patients). HIV prevalence was 77%. TB was diagnosed in 195 (49%), including 161 culture-positive patients, and confidently excluded in 114 (29%) participants. LAM ELISA sensitivity was 44% (95%CI 36-52) for culture-confirmed TB (52% in smear-positive patients). Specificity was 89% (95%CI 81-94). Sensitivity was significantly higher in HIV-related TB (52%, 95%CI 43-62, P < 0.001) compared to HIV-negative TB (21%, 95%CI 9-37). Sensitivity in smear-negative patients was low (28%, 95%CI 13-43) for combined HIV-positive and -negative patients.Our findings confirm greater sensitivity of urine LAM detection for HIV-related TB. However, both sensitivity and specificity were suboptimal, suggesting that this version cannot confirm or exclude TB in either HIV-infected or non-infected patients.Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for screening ambulatory HIV-infected persons for tuberculosis.To assess the diagnostic accuracy of the urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test among ambulatory HIV-infected persons.Cross-sectional.HIV-infected persons consecutively presenting to the HIV Clinic at Tembisa Main Clinic in Ekhuruleni, South Africa, were screened for symptoms of tuberculosis (TB) and asked to provide sputum and blood samples for smears for acid-fast bacilli and mycobacterial culture and a urine specimen for a LAM enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Fine needle aspirates were obtained from participants with enlarged lymph nodes and sent for histopathology. Nonpregnant participants underwent chest x-ray.: Four hundred twenty-two HIV-infected participants were enrolled with median age 37 years (interquartile range: 31-44 years), median CD4+ T-cell count 215 cells per microliter (interquartile range: 107-347 cells/μL), and 212 (50%) receiving antiretroviral therapy. Thirty (7%) had active TB: 18 with only pulmonary TB, 5 with only extrapulmonary TB, and 7 with both pulmonary TB and extrapulmonary TB. Twenty-seven percent [95% confidence interval (CI): 12% to 48%] of TB cases were sputum acid-fast bacilli positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the urine LAM compared with the gold standard of positive bacteriology or histopathology were 32% (95% CI: 16% to 52%) and 98% (95% CI: 96% to 99%), respectively. Urine LAM had higher sensitivity in TB cases with higher bacillary burdens, though these differences were not statistically significant.The sensitivity of urine LAM testing is inadequate to replace mycobacterial culture. In contrast to prior research on the urine LAM, this study was conducted among less sick, ambulatory HIV-infected patients presenting for routine care.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis biomarkers in a sandwich immunoassay format using a waveguide-based optical biosensor.Early diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB) remains an elusive challenge, especially in individuals with disseminated TB and HIV co-infection. Recent studies have shown a promise for the direct detection of pathogen-specific biomarkers such as lipoarabinomannan (LAM) for the diagnosis of TB in HIV-positive individuals. Currently, traditional immunoassay platforms that suffer from poor sensitivity and high non-specific interactions are used for the detection of such biomarkers. In this manuscript, we demonstrate the development of sandwich immunoassays for the direct detection of three TB-specific biomarkers, namely LAM, early secretory antigenic target 6 (ESAT6) and antigen 85 complex (Ag85), using a waveguide-based optical biosensor platform. Combining detection within the evanescent field of a planar optical waveguide with functional surfaces that reduce non-specific interactions allows for the ultra-sensitive and quantitative detection of biomarkers (an order of magnitude enhanced sensitivity, as compared to plate-based ELISA) in complex patient samples (urine, serum) within a short time. We also demonstrate the detection of LAM in urine from a small sample of subjects being treated for TB using this approach with excellent sensitivity and 100% corroboration with disease status. These results suggest that pathogen-specific biomarkers can be applied for the rapid and effective diagnosis of disease. It is likely that detection of a combination of biomarkers offers greater reliability of diagnosis, rather than detection of any single pathogen biomarker. NCT00341601.Underestimation of the incremental diagnostic yield of HIV-associated tuberculosis in studies of the Determine TB-LAM Ag urine assay.Quantitative analysis of a urine-based assay for detection of lipoarabinomannan in patients with tuberculosis.Urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) detection is a promising approach for rapid diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB). In microbiologically confirmed TB patients, quantitative LAM detection results increased progressively with bacillary burden and immunosuppression. Patients with disseminated TB and/or advanced HIV are target populations for whom urine LAM detection may be particularly useful.The diagnostic accuracy of urine-based Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected hospitalized patients who are smear-negative or sputum scarce.Hospitals in sub-Saharan Africa are inundated with HIV-infected patients and tuberculosis (TB) is the commonest opportunistic infection in this sub-group. Up to one third of TB-HIV co-infected patients fail to produce a sputum sample (sputum scarce) and diagnosis is thus often delayed or missed. We investigated the sensitivity of urine-based methods (Xpert MTB/RIF, LAM strip test and LAM ELISA) in such patients.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with clinically suspected TB provided a spot urine sample. The reference standard was culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis on ≥1 sputum or extra-pulmonary sample. MTB/RIF was performed using 1 ml of both unprocessed and, when possible, concentrated urine. Each unconcentrated urine sample was also tested using the Clearview LAM ELISA and Alere LAM strip test. 42% (116/242) of patients had culture-proven TB. 18% (20/54) were sputum scarce. In sputum-scarce patients, the sensitivity of urine MTB/RIF and LAM ELISA was 40% (95%CI: 22-61) and 60% (95%CI: 39-78), respectively. Urine MTB/RIF specificity was 98% (95%CI: 95-100). Combined sensitivity of urine LAM ELISA and MTB/RIF was better than MTB/RIF alone [MTB/RIF and LAM: 70% (95%CI: 48-85) vs. MTB/RIF: 40% (95%CI: 22-61), p = 0.03]. Significant predictors of urine MTB/RIF positivity were CD4<50 cells/ml (p = 0.001), elevated protein-to-creatinine ratio (p<0.001) and LAM ELISA positivity (p<0.001). Urine centrifugation and pelleting significantly increased the sensitivity of MTB/RIF over unprocessed urine in paired samples [42% (95%CI: 26-58) vs. 8% (95%CI: 0-16), p<0.001]. Urine MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values correlated poorly with markers of bacillary burden (smear grade and time-to-positivity).This preliminary study indicates that urine-based MTB/RIF, alone or in combination with LAM antigen detection, may potentially aid the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients with advanced immunosuppression when sputum-based diagnosis is not possible. Concentration of urine prior to MTB/RIF-testing significantly improves sensitivity.Urine lipoarabinomannan assay for tuberculosis screening before antiretroviral therapy diagnostic yield and association with immune reconstitution disease.To assess the utility of urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) detection as a diagnostic screening test for tuberculosis (TB) in HIV-infected patients with advanced immuno deficiency and high prevalence of sputum smear-negative pulmonary disease.Cross-sectional survey.Unselected adults enrolling for antiretroviral therapy (ART) in a South African clinic were screened for TB with two sputum samples for fluorescence microscopy and mycobacterial liquid culture. LAM was measured in urine samples using a commercially available enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.Sputum culture-positive TB was diagnosed in 58 patients (median CD4 cell count=78 cells/microliter) out of 235 patients screened (TB prevalence=0.25). Cultures were identified as positive after a mean of 24 days (SD=9 days). The sensitivity of sputum microscopy was just 0.14 (specificity=1.00), whereas that of LAM in concentrated urine was 0.38 (P<0.01; specificity=1.00). In those with CD4 cell counts of less than 50, 50-100 and more than 150 cells/microliter, the LAM assay sensitivities were 0.67, 0.41 and 0.13, respectively. Corresponding values for the combined use of the LAM assay and microscopy were 0.67, 0.53 and 0.21, respectively. Among TB patients, detectable LAM was very strongly associated with low CD4 cell counts and advanced clinical stage. All patients who developed TB immune reconstitution disease (n=5) had detectable urinary LAM at baseline.The LAM assay has substantially superior sensitivity to sputum microscopy as a routine diagnostic TB screening test among patients with CD4 cell counts less than 100 cells/microliter. In one half of such patients, this assay could reduce the mean time to diagnosis by approximately 3 weeks. Furthermore, detectable urinary LAM may predict the development of TB immune reconstitution disease.Predictive value of anemia for tuberculosis in HIV-infected patients in Sub-Saharan Africa: an indication for routine microbiological investigation using new rapid assays.The relationship between anemia and undiagnosed tuberculosis (TB) in patients living with HIV in sub-Saharan Africa is incompletely defined. We assessed the prevalence of TB among those with HIV-related anemia and evaluated new means of rapid TB diagnosis.Blood hemoglobin levels were measured in unselected antiretroviral treatment-naive patients in Cape Town, South Africa, and anemia was classified according to World Health Organization criteria. All patients were screened for TB by testing paired sputum samples using liquid culture (reference standard), fluorescence microscopy, and Xpert MTB/RIF. Urine samples were tested for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) using the Determine TB-LAM diagnostic assay.Of 602 adults screened, 485 had complete results. Normal hemoglobin levels were found in 44.5% (n = 216) of patients, and mild, moderate, or severe anemia were present in 24.9% (n = 121), 25.4% (n = 123) and 5.2% (n = 25) of patients, respectively. Culture-confirmed pulmonary TB was diagnosed in 8.8% (19/216) of those without anemia compared with 16.5% (20/121), 26.0% (32/123), and 40.0% (10/25) among those with mild, moderate, or severe anemia, respectively (P < 0.001). Anemia was a strong independent predictor of TB. The sensitivities of diagnostic assays were much higher among those with moderate/severe anemia compared with those with no/mild anemia using sputum microscopy (42.9% vs 15.4%), urine LAM (54.8% vs 0%), sputum microscopy plus urine LAM (71.4% vs 15.4%), and sputum Xpert (73.8% vs 41.0%) (P < 0.01 for all).A very high prevalence of undiagnosed TB was found in patients with moderate or severe anemia. Such patients should be prioritized for routine microbiological investigation using rapid diagnostic assays.Clinical utility of a commercial LAM-ELISA assay for TB diagnosis in HIV-infected patients using urine and sputum samples.The accurate diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients, particularly with advanced immunosuppression, is difficult. Recent studies indicate that a lipoarabinomannan (LAM) assay (Clearview-TB(R)-ELISA) may have some utility for the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients; however, the precise subgroup that may benefit from this technology requires clarification. The utility of LAM in sputum samples has, hitherto, not been evaluated.LAM was measured in sputum and urine samples obtained from 500 consecutively recruited ambulant patients, with suspected TB, from 2 primary care clinics in South Africa. Culture positivity for M. tuberculosis was used as the reference standard for TB diagnosis.Of 440 evaluable patients 120/387 (31%) were HIV-infected. Urine-LAM positivity was associated with HIV positivity (p = 0.007) and test sensitivity, although low, was significantly higher in HIV-infected compared to uninfected patients (21% versus 6%; p<0.001), and also in HIV-infected participants with a CD4 <200 versus >200 cells/mm(3) (37% versus 0%; p = 0.003). Urine-LAM remained highly specific in all 3 subgroups (95%-100%). 25% of smear-negative but culture-positive HIV-infected patients with a CD4 <200 cells/mm(3) were positive for urine-LAM. Sputum-LAM had good sensitivity (86%) but poor specificity (15%) likely due to test cross-reactivity with several mouth-residing organisms including actinomycetes and nocardia species.These preliminary data indicate that in a high burden primary care setting the diagnostic usefulness of urine-LAM is limited, as a rule-in test, to a specific patient subgroup i.e. smear-negative HIV-infected TB patients with a CD4 count <200 cells/mm(3), who would otherwise have required further investigation. However, even in this group sensitivity was modest. Future and adequately powered studies in a primary care setting should now specifically target patients with suspected TB who have advanced HIV infection.Low sensitivity of a urine LAM-ELISA in the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis.The development and evaluation of rapid and accurate new diagnostic tools is essential to improve tuberculosis (TB) control in developing countries. In a previous study, the first release of a urine LAM-ELISA by Chemogen (Portland, USA) has been evaluated with a promising sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of pulmonary TB. In the present study, the now commercially available assay has been clinically assessed regarding its diagnostic value alone and in combination with clinical co-factors.The test was applied to two urine samples from 291 consecutively enrolled Tanzanian patients with suspected pulmonary tuberculosis. The participants were subsequently assigned to classification groups according to microbiological, clinical and radiological findings at recruitment and during a maximum follow up period of 56 days.Only 35 out of 69 pulmonary TB cases -confirmed by smear microscopy and/or solid culture and/or liquid culture- showed at least one positive LAM-ELISA result (sensitivity 50.7%). The sensitivity was noticeably higher in females (66.7%) and in HIV positive participants (62.0%). The specificity amounted to 87.8% and was determined in participants with negative results in all microbiological tests and with sustained recovery under antibiotic treatment at day 56. Correlation with urinalysis revealed that proteinuria was significantly and positively associated with LAM-positivity (P = 0.026).This commercially available generation of LAM-ELISA does not appear to be useful as an independent diagnostic test for pulmonary tuberculosis. The question whether the assay is suitable as a supplemental device in the diagnosis of HIV-associated TB, requires further investigations.Cost utility of lateral-flow urine lipoarabinomannan for tuberculosis diagnosis in HIV-infected African adults.In-patient hospitals in South Africa and Uganda.To evaluate the cost-effectiveness of a lateral-flow urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test when added to existing strategies for tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis in human immunodeficiency virus infected adults (CD4(+) T-cell counts < 100 cells/l) with symptoms of active TB.Decision-analytic cost-utility model, with the primary outcome being the incremental cost-effectiveness ratio, expressed in 2010 US dollars per disability-adjusted life year (DALY) averted from the perspective of a public sector TB control program.For every 1000 patients tested, adding lateral-flow urine LAM generated 80 incremental appropriate anti-tuberculosis treatments and averted 224 DALYs. Estimated cost utility was US$353 per DALY averted (95% uncertainty range $192$1161) in South Africa and $86 per DALY averted (95% uncertainty range $49$239) in Uganda, reflecting the lower treatment costs in Uganda. Cost utility was most sensitive to assay specificity, cost of anti-tuberculosis treatment, life expectancy after TB cure and cohort TB prevalence, but did not rise above $1500 per DALY averted in South Africa under any one-way sensitivity analysis. The probability of acceptability was >99.8% at a per-DALY willingness-to-pay threshold equal to the per capita gross domestic product in South Africa ($7275) and Uganda ($509).Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan strip-test for TB detection in HIV-infected hospitalised patients.Lack of point-of-care tests for tuberculosis (TB) result in diagnostic delay, and increased mortality and healthcare-related costs. The urine Determine(TM) TB-LAM point-of-care strip-test was evaluated in 335 prospectively-recruited hospitalised patients with suspected TB-HIV co-infection (group 1) and from 88 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with non-TB diagnoses (group 2). Cut-off point-specific analyses were performed using: 1) a microbiological reference standard (culture positive versus negative); and 2) a composite reference standard (exclusion of patients with clinical-TB from the culture-negative group). Using the microbiological reference and the manufacturer-recommended grade-1 cut-off point, LAM sensitivity and specificity was 66% (95% CI 57-74%). By contrast, using the composite reference sensitivity was 60% (95% CI 53-67%) and specificity improved to 96% (95% CI 89-100%) (p=0.001). The same pattern was seen when the grade-2 cut-off point was used (specificity 75% versus 96%; p=0.01). In group two patients specificity was poor using the grade-1 cut-off point, but improved significantly when the grade-2 cut-off point was used (90% versus 99%; p=0.009). The grade-2 cut-off point also offered superior inter-reader reliability (p=0.002). Sensitivity was highest in those with a CD4 <200 cells per mL. LAM combined with smear-microscopy was able to rule-in TB in 71% of Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture-positive patients. This preliminary study indicates that the LAM strip-test may be a potentially useful rapid rule-in test for TB in hospitalised patients with advanced immunosuppression. The grade 2, but not the manufacturer-recommended grade 1 cut-off point, offered superior rule-in utility and inter-reader reliability. Larger studies to evaluate cut-off points and diagnostic accuracy are urgently required.Comparative performance of urinary lipoarabinomannan assays and Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected individuals.Xpert MTB/RIF ('Xpert') and urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) assays offer rapid tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis, but have suboptimal sensitivity when used individually in HIV-positive patients. The yield of these tests used in combination for the diagnosis of active TB among HIV-infected TB suspects is unknown.Study of comparative diagnostic accuracy nested into a prospective study of HIV-infected individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TB in Uganda.Xpert testing of archived sputum was conducted for culture-confirmed TB cases and TB suspects in whom a diagnosis of TB was excluded. Additional testing included sputum smear microscopy, sputum culture (solid and liquid media), mycobacterial blood culture, and urinary testing for LAM using a lateral flow test ('LF-LAM') and an enzyme-linked immunosorbance assay ('ELISA-LAM').Among 103 participants with culture-confirmed TB, sensitivity of Xpert was 76% (95% confidence interval, CI 0.66-0.84), and was superior to that of LF-LAM (49%, 95% CI 0.39-0.59, P < 0.001). Specificity was greater than 97% for both tests among 105 individuals without TB. The combination of smear microscopy and LF-LAM identified 67% (95% CI 0.57-0.76) of culture-confirmed TB cases and approached sensitivity of Xpert testing alone (P = 0.15). The sensitivity of the combination of Xpert and LF-LAM was 85% (88/103 95% CI 0.77-0.92), which was superior to either test alone (P < 0.05) and approached sensitivity of sputum liquid culture testing (94%, 95% CI 0.88-0.98, P = 0.17).Sputum Xpert and urinary LAM assays were complementary for the diagnosis of active TB in HIV-infected patients, and sensitivity of the combination of these tests was superior to that of either test alone.Rapid diagnosis of tuberculosis by detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan in urine.There is an urgent need for improved tools for laboratory diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB). Here, we describe two methods, a catch-up ELISA and a dipstick test based on the detection in urine of lipoarabinomannan (LAM). LAM is a major and specific glycolipid component of the outer mycobacterial cell wall. Preliminary experiments showed that LAM is excreted in the urine of mice injected intraperitoneally with a crude cell wall preparation of Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Both methods were highly sensitive, detecting LAM at concentrations of 1 ng/ml and 5 pg/ml, respectively. Of 15 patients with active TB, all showed intermediate to high levels of LAM in their urine (absorbance values from 0.3 to 1.2, mean 0.74). Only one sample showed an absorbance value below the chosen cut off value of 0.4. All but one of the urine samples from 26 healthy nursing workers exhibited OD value below 0.4 cut off. These methods may prove valuable for rapid and simple diagnosis of TB in particular in developing countries lacking biosafety level 3 (BSL3) facilities.Clinical significance of lipoarabinomannan detection in urine using a low-cost point-of-care diagnostic assay for HIV-associated tuberculosis.A low-cost point-of-care urine assay for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) used for screening patients prior to antiretroviral therapy (ART) rapidly diagnoses a proportion of tuberculosis (TB) cases. We determined the characteristics and outcomes of such patients.Adults enrolling in a South African township ART clinic were systematically screened for pulmonary TB by testing paired sputum samples using microscopy, liquid culture and Xpert MTB/RIF in a centralized laboratory. Stored urine samples were retrospectively tested for LAM using the Determine TB-LAM assay, but results did not inform treatment. Patients were followed up in the routine ART service and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined. Analysis was restricted to those with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl.Of patients with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl and complete results (n=325), 59 (18.2%) had culture-positive TB. Of these, 23 (39%) patients tested urine LAM-positive and 36 (61%) urine LAM-negative. Patients with LAM-positive TB had much lower CD4 cell counts, higher plasma viral loads, lower haemoglobin concentrations and lower BMIs compared to those with LAM-negative TB. They also had evidence of higher mycobacterial load, more frequently testing sputum smear-positive, Xpert-positive (sputum and urine) and having a shorter time to sputum culture positivity. Of five (8.5%) patients who died, four did so before TB treatment was started. All five retrospectively tested LAM-positive.A low-cost point-of-care urine test for LAM rapidly diagnoses a sub-group of cases with advanced HIV-associated TB and poor prognosis. If used in combination with laboratory-based diagnostics, treatment delays would decrease and survival might be improved.Diagnosis of tuberculosis by a visually detectable immunoassay for lipoarabinomannan.Recovery of tubercle bacilli from sputum, tissue, or body fluid is the standard for the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB) although this process is technically demanding and relatively insensitive. We have developed a simplified, visually detectable, colloidal gold-based serological assay to qualitatively detect IgG directed against the mycobacterial cell wall component lipoarabinomannan (LAM). The objective of this investigation is to determine the accuracy of this assay in patients with active pulmonary TB and in control patients with or without latent infection. In patients with active TB, the sensitivity of anti-LAM IgG was 85 to 93%. In five patients with active TB who were smear-negative, all tested positive for anti-LAM IgG. The specificity of the test depended on the presence of tuberculous infection. In U.S. citizens comprised of young healthy adults and rheumatology patients, the specificity was 100%. In an at-risk population for tuberculous infection who were either tuberculin skin test-negative or positive, the specificity was 89%. The negative and positive predictive values of the test were 98% and 52%, respectively. We conclude that anti-LAM IgG immunoassay is relatively sensitive and specific for active TB and thus, a potentially useful screening test for active TB.Diagnostic accuracy of a point-of-care urine test for tuberculosis screening among newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults: a prospective, clinic-based study.A rapid diagnostic test for active tuberculosis (TB) at the clinical point-of-care could expedite case detection and accelerate TB treatment initiation. We assessed the diagnostic accuracy of a rapid urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test for TB screening among HIV-infected adults in a TB-endemic setting.We prospectively enrolled newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults (≥18 years) at 4 outpatient clinics in Durban from Oct 2011-May 2012, excluding those on TB therapy. A physician evaluated all participants and offered CD4 cell count testing. Trained study nurses collected a sputum sample for acid-fast bacilli smear microscopy (AFB) and mycobacterial culture, and performed urine LAM testing using Determine™ TB LAM in the clinic. The presence of a band regardless of intensity on the urine LAM test was considered positive. We defined as the gold standard for active pulmonary TB a positive sputum culture for Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Diagnostic accuracy of urine LAM was assessed, alone and in combination with smear microscopy, and stratified by CD4 cell count.Among 342 newly-diagnosed HIV-infected participants, 190 (56%) were male, mean age was 35.6 years, and median CD4 was 182/mm3. Sixty participants had culture-positive pulmonary TB, resulting in an estimated prevalence of 17.5% (95% CI 13.7-22.0%). Forty-five (13.2%) participants were urine LAM positive. Mean time from urine specimen collection to LAM test result was 40 minutes (95% CI 34-46 minutes). Urine LAM test sensitivity was 28.3% (95% CI 17.5-41.4) overall, and 37.5% (95% CI 21.1-56.3) for those with CD4 count <100/mm3, while specificity was 90.1% (95% CI 86.0-93.3) overall, and 86.9% (95% CI 75.8-94.2) for those with CD4 < 100/mm3. When combined with sputum AFB (either test positive), sensitivity increased to 38.3% (95% CI 26.0-51.8), but specificity decreased to 85.8% (95% CI 81.1-89.7).In this prospective, clinic-based study with trained nurses, a rapid urine LAM test had low sensitivity for TB screening among newly-diagnosed HIV-infected adults, but improved sensitivity when combined with sputum smear microscopy.Value of urine lipoarabinomannan grade and second test for optimizing clinic-based screening for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis.We assessed the role of urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) grade and a second LAM test for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) screening in outpatient clinics in South Africa.We enrolled newly diagnosed HIV-infected adults (≥18 years) at 4 clinics, excluding those on TB therapy. Participants provided sputum for acid-fast bacilli (AFB) microscopy and culture. Nurses conducted 2 rapid urine LAM tests at the point-of-care and graded positive results from low (faint) to high (5+). Culture-confirmed pulmonary TB was the gold standard. We used area under receiver operating curves (AUROC) to compare screening strategies.Among 320 HIV-infected adults, median CD4 was 248 cells per cubic millimeter (interquartile range, 107-379/mm); 54 (17%) were TB culture positive. Fifty-two (16%) of all participants were LAM positive by either test; correlation between LAM tests was high. Among 10 "faint" positive results, 2 (20%) had culture-positive TB. Using ≥1+ LAM grade as positive, 1 LAM test had sensitivity of 41% [95% confidence interval (CI): 28% to 55%] and specificity of 92% (95% CI: 88% to 95%). A 2 LAM test strategy had a sensitivity of 43% (95% CI: 29% to 57%). One LAM test ≥1+ grade (AUROC = 0.66; 95% CI: 0.60 to 0.73) was significantly better than sputum AFB alone. The optimal strategy was sequentially performing 1 LAM test followed by sputum AFB if LAM grade <1+ (AUROC = 0.70; 95% CI: 0.63 to 0.77), which had sensitivity of 48% (95% CI: 34% to 62%) and specificity of 91% (95% CI: 87% to 94%).In this clinic-based study, "faint" line was a false-positive second urine LAM test added no value, and an optimal screening strategy was 1 LAM test followed by sputum AFB microscopy for urine LAM-negative people.Diagnostic evaluation of urinary lipoarabinomannan at an Ethiopian tuberculosis centre.Direct capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) was performed on urine samples from 200 tuberculosis (TB) patients and 800 non-TB patients routinely diagnosed among consecutive suspects in an Ethiopian TB centre. 50 healthy Ethiopians, 50 healthy individuals and 100 non-TB patients from Norway served as controls. Of the TB patients, 139 (69.5%) were positive for acid-fast bacilli (AFB). In the remaining cases the diagnosis was based on suggestive clinical findings. All Ethiopian non-TB patients were AFB negative and showed no clinical evidence of TB. In the Ethiopian groups, 148 (74%) of the TB patients, 105 (13.1%) of the non-TB patients and 5 (10%) of the healthy controls were positive by the LAM-ELISA. 113 (81.3%) of AFB positives and 35 (57.4%) of AFB-negative TB patients had positive LAM-ELISA. In the Norwegian groups all were LAM negative. The sensitivity and specificity of the LAM-ELISA for TB patients versus Ethiopian non-TB patients were 74% and 86.9%, respectively; the positive and negative predictive values were 58.5% and 93.0%. This study suggests that detection of LAM in the urine of TB patients may improve case finding and that diagnostic tests based on this principle may serve as valuable supplemental tools in TB control.Detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan with an antigen-capture ELISA in unprocessed urine of Tanzanian patients with suspected tuberculosis.A direct antigen-capture ELISA based on the detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in unprocessed urine was evaluated for its usefulness in clinical practice. In Tanzania, 231 patients with suspected pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) and 103 healthy volunteers were screened with standard TB tests and with the new LAM-ELISA. Of 132 patients with confirmed pulmonary mycobacterial disease (positive sputum culture), 106 were positive using the LAM-ELISA (sensitivity 80.3%). In comparison, the sensitivity of acid-fast bacilli (AFB) sputum microscopy was 62.1% (82 of 132 confirmed cases). Of the 231 patients, 17 were both culture- and AFB-negative, but had typical radiographic signs of pulmonary mycobacterial infection and did not respond to antibiotic treatment. Of these 17 patients, 13 (76.5%) had positive LAM-ELISA test results. To define the specificity of the assay, urine samples from 103 healthy volunteers were also screened using LAM-ELISA. All but one had an optical density below the cut-off (specificity 99%). Of interest was a significant correlation between level of microscopic density of mycobacteria in sputum and LAM antigen concentration in urine (chi2=8.44). The LAM-ELISA is a field-adapted tool that can improve screening standards in countries with a high incidence of TB.Diagnostic accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan test for tuberculosis in hospitalized patients in a High HIV prevalence setting.Effective tuberculosis (TB) control in HIV-prevalent settings is hindered by absence of accurate, rapid TB diagnostic tests. We evaluated the accuracy of a urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) test for TB diagnosis in South Africa.Hospitalized adults with signs and/or symptoms of active TB were enrolled. Sputum smear microscopy and mycobacterial culture, mycobacterial blood culture, and HIV testing were performed. A spot urine specimen was tested for LAM.Four hundred ninety nine participants were enrolled; 422 (84.6%) were HIV infected. In microbiologically confirmed TB patients, the LAM test was positive in 114 of 193 [sensitivity 59%, (95% confidence interval: 52 to 66)], including 112 of 167 [67% (59 to 74)] who were HIV infected. Among individuals classified as "not TB", the LAM test was negative in 117 of 122 [specificity 96% (91 to 99)], including 83 of 88 [94% (87 to 98)] who were HIV infected. In confirmed TB patients, the LAM test was more sensitive than sputum smear microscopy (42%, 82 of 193, P < 0.001) and detected 56% (62 of 111) of those who were sputum smear negative. HIV infection [adjusted odds ratio (AOR 13.4)], mycobacteremia (AOR 3.21), and positive sputum smear (AOR 2.42) were risk factors for a positive LAM test.The urine LAM test detected a subset of HIV-infected patients with severe TB in whom sputum smear microscopy had suboptimal sensitivity. The combination of urine LAM testing and sputum smear microscopy is attractive for use in settings with high HIV burden.Diagnostic accuracy of induced sputum LAM ELISA for tuberculosis diagnosis in sputum-scarce patients.To examine whether a lipoarabinomannan (LAM) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) that offers diagnostic utility using urine in patients with tuberculosis (TB) and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) co-infection can be used in induced sputum to diagnose sputum-scarce patients with suspected TB.LAM was measured in induced sputum samples obtained from 61 consecutively recruited sputum-scarce TB suspects in a tertiary hospital respiratory clinic in South Africa. Liquid culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis was used as the reference standard. Receiver operating characteristic analysis was used to assess alternative LAM concentration cut-offs.A total of 87% (53/61) of study patients had a valid M. tuberculosis culture result; 49% (23/53) were HIV-infected and 17% (9/53) were culture-positive for M. tuberculosis. Induced sputum smear microscopy and LAM ELISA had an overall sensitivity of 56% (95%CI 27-81); however, the specificity of LAM ELISA was 48% (95%CI 34-62), while the positive and negative predictive values were respectively 18% (95%CI 8-36) and 84% (95%CI 65-94). An optimal rule-in cut-off selected by receiver operating characteristic (LAM concentration >5.73 ng/ml) increased test specificity to 98% and reduced sensitivity to 22%. Normalisation of the assay for sample total protein or cell count did not improve diagnostic accuracy.In this proof-of-concept study, the ELISA was not clinically useful for TB diagnosis using induced sputum.Modification of clearview tuberculosis (TB) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for TB patients not infected with HIV.Diagnosis of active tuberculosis by detection of urinary lipoarabinomannan (uLAM) from Mycobacterium tuberculosis is an attractive approach. Concentrating urine 100-fold allowed quantitation of uLAM at levels equal to picograms/ml of nonconcentrated urine. The approach of concentrating urine 100-fold improved the clinical sensitivity of the Clearview TB enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) from 7% to 57% yet impaired its specificity from 97% to 89%. (This study has been registered at University Hospital of Turku under registration no. 47/180/2009, Helsinki University Central Hospital under 149/2010, University Hospital of Kuopio under 105/2010, and China Medical University Hospital, Taichung, under DMR-99-IRB-075-2.). Blinded evaluation of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan for active tuberculosis: a pilot study.Urine antigen testing is an attractive strategy for the diagnosis of active tuberculosis (TB), but accuracy data are scarce.To prospectively evaluate the diagnostic performance of commercial urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen testing for active TB among pulmonary and extra-pulmonary TB suspects.Prospective blinded evaluation of 200 adult TB suspects at a tertiary referral hospital in India. Reference standards included culture and clinical diagnosis.Patients were 61% male (mean age 40.4 years): 8.5% were human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infected and 47 of 200 (23.5%) were culture-positive for TB. Compared to positivity on either Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) or BACTEC cultures, LAM sensitivity was 17.8% (95%CI 8.5-32.6), while specificity was 87.7% (95%CI 81.3-92.3). Compared to positivity on both LJ and BACTEC, LAM sensitivity was 5.8% (95%CI 12.5-44.9), with a specificity of 88.8% (95%CI 82.7-92.9). Compared to the clinical diagnosis, LAM sensitivity was 20.0% (95%CI 1.1-70.1), with a specificity of 83.3% (95%CI 50.9-97.0). HIV and smear status did not influence test accuracy.In its current form, LAM is insensitive for the diagnosis of active TB, although its specificity is adequate.Detection of lipoarabinomannan as a diagnostic test for tuberculosis.A coagglutination technique was established for the detection of lipoarabinomannan of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in human serum samples and evaluated for its utility in the diagnosis of tuberculosis at the Instituto Nacional de Enfermedades Respiratorias in Mexico City. The test had a sensitivity of 88% in patients with sputum-smear-positive active pulmonary tuberculosis. The sensitivity in patients with active pulmonary tuberculosis negative for acid-fast bacilli in sputum was 67%. Less favorable results were obtained for patients with AIDS and tuberculosis, with a sensitivity of 57%. The specificity in control patients with lung diseases different from tuberculosis and in healthy subjects was 100%. The positive predictive value was 100%, and the negative predictive value for patients with sputum-positive active pulmonary tuberculosis was 97%. The results of this study suggest that the detection of lipoarabinomannan is an accurate test for the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis.Circulating antibodies to lipoarabinomannan in relation to sputum microscopy, clinical features and urinary anti-lipoarabinomannan detection in pulmonary tuberculosis.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA)-based investigation of anti-lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antibody levels in the sera of patients with acid-fast bacilli (AFB)-positive pulmonary tuberculosis (PTB), AFB-negative PTB and non-TB respiratory tract symptoms was conducted. The anti-LAM results were further evaluated using urine LAM detection and a clinical diagnostic score (DS) system as references. Using sputum AFB as a reference, positive anti-LAM was found in 66.9% of 139 AFB-positive PTB, 34.4% of 61 AFB-negative PTB and 23.5% of 800 non-TB patients and in 8% of 50 healthy individuals. The positive and negative predictive values were 48.7% and 87.4%, respectively. Using the DS as a reference, the sensitivity and specificity were 50.5% and 78.3%, respectively, whereas 45.8% of urine LAM positives and 77.9% of urine LAM negatives were correctly identified by the anti-LAM ELISA. In TB endemic areas a negative anti-LAM could be of practical value, particularly when other indicators of PTB are negative. Using any of these methods as a reference, a positive anti-LAM would mislead in about one-quarter of cases. Had all the 3 methods been combined and at least 2 positive tests sufficed, 90.6% of AFB-positive PTB, 52.5% of AFB-negative PTB and 94.9% of non-TB patients would have been correctly diagnosed. Apart from the possible impact of HIV, the low accuracy of the current assay could be due to intravascular formation of LAM-anti-LAM complexes, latent TB or environmental mycobacterial infections.Reasons for false-positive lipoarabinomannan ELISA results in a Tanzanian population.Lipoarabinomannan (LAM), a cell wall component of mycobacteria, can be detected in the urine of tuberculosis (TB) patients. Advantages of this diagnostic include the ease of sample collection and test methods. However, as with most new TB diagnostics, LAM tests have been evaluated in well-controlled laboratory settings and subsequently need assessment under real working conditions. Our experience showed that the diagnosis of TB using the detection of LAM in urine under field conditions is prone to false-positive results due to contamination. Dust and soil, but also stool, seemed to lead to increased OD values and thus false-positive results of the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for LAM; however, contamination with blood, as well as bacterial or fungal organisms, had no influence. The collection of urine for the detection of LAM should therefore follow strict collection criteria in order to avoid contamination.Test characteristics of urinary lipoarabinomannan and predictors of mortality among hospitalized HIV-infected tuberculosis suspects in Tanzania.Tuberculosis is the most common cause of death among patients with HIV infection living in tuberculosis endemic countries, but many cases are not diagnosed pre-mortem. We assessed the test characteristics of urinary lipoarabinomannan (LAM) and predictors of mortality among HIV-associated tuberculosis suspects in Tanzania.We prospectively enrolled hospitalized HIV-infected patients in Dar es Salaam, with ≥2 weeks of cough or fever, or weight loss. Subjects gave 2 mLs of urine to test for LAM using a commercially available ELISA, ≥2 sputum specimens for concentrated AFB smear and solid media culture, and 40 mLs of blood for culture.Among 212 evaluable subjects, 143 (68%) were female; mean age was 36 years; and the median CD4 count 86 cells/mm(3). 69 subjects (33%) had culture confirmation of tuberculosis and 65 (31%) were LAM positive. For 69 cases of sputum or blood culture-confirmed tuberculosis, LAM sensitivity was 65% and specificity 86% compared to 36% and 98% for sputum smear. LAM test characteristics were not different in patients with bacteremia but showed higher sensitivity and lower specificity with decreasing CD4 cell count. Two month mortality was 64 (53%) of 121 with outcomes available. In multivariate analysis there was significant association of mortality with absence of anti-retroviral therapy (p = 0.004) and a trend toward association with a positive urine LAM (p = 0.16). Among culture-negative patients mortality was 9 (75%) of 12 in LAM positive patients and 27 (38%) of 71 in LAM negative patients (p = 0.02).Urine LAM is more sensitive than sputum smear and has utility for the rapid diagnosis of culture-confirmed tuberculosis in this high-risk population. Mortality data raise the possibility that urine LAM may also be a marker for culture-negative tuberculosis.Point-of-care lateral flow assays for tuberculosis and cryptococcal antigenuria predict death in HIV infected adults in Uganda.Mortality in hospitalized, febrile patients in Sub-Saharan Africa is high due to HIV-infected, severely immunosuppressed patients with opportunistic co-infection, particularly disseminated tuberculosis (TB) and cryptococcal disease. We sought to determine if a positive lateral flow assay (LFA) result for urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) and cryptococcal antigenuria was associated with mortality.351 hospitalized, HIV-positive adults with symptoms consistent with TB and who were able to provide both urine and sputum specimens were prospectively enrolled at Mulago National Referral Hospital in Uganda as part of a prospective accuracy evaluation of the lateral flow Determine TB LAM test. Stored frozen urine was retrospectively tested for cryptococcal antigen (CRAG) using the LFA. We fitted a multinomial logistic regression model to analyze factors associated with death within 2 months after initial presentation.The median CD4 of the participants was 57 (IQR: 14-179) cells/µl and 41% (145) were microbiologically confirmed TB cases. LAM LFA was positive in 38% (134), 7% (25) were CRAG positive, and 43% (151) were positive for either test in urine. Overall, 21% (75) died within the first 2 months, and a total of 32% (114) were confirmed dead by 6 months. At 2 months, 30% of LAM or CRAG positive patients were confirmed dead compared to 15.0% of those who were negative. In an adjusted model, LAM or CRAG positive results were associated with an increased risk of death (RRR 2.29, 95% CI: 1.29, 4.05; P = 0.005).In hospitalized HIV-infected patients, LAM or CRAG LFA positivity was associated with subsequent death within 2 months. Further studies are warranted to examine the impact of POC diagnostic 'test and treat' approach on patient-centered outcomes.Diagnostic accuracy of a rapid urine lipoarabinomannan test for tuberculosis in HIV-infected adults.In settings of high HIV prevalence, tuberculosis control and patient management are hindered by lack of accurate, rapid tuberculosis diagnostic tests that can be performed at point-of-care. The Determine TB LAM Ag (TB LAM) test is a lateral flow immunochromatographic test for detection of mycobacterial lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine. Our objective was to determine sensitivity and specificity of the TB LAM test for tuberculosis diagnosis.Prospective diagnostic accuracy study.Hospital and outpatient settings in Uganda and South Africa.HIV-infected adults with tuberculosis symptoms and/or signs.Participants provided a fresh urine specimen for TB LAM testing, blood for mycobacterial culture, and 2 respiratory specimens for smear microscopy and mycobacterial culture.For the TB LAM test, sensitivity in participants with culture-positive tuberculosis and specificity in participants without tuberculosis.A total of 1013 participants were enrolled. Among culture-positive tuberculosis patients, the TB LAM test identified 136/367 (37.1%) overall and 116/196 (59.2%) in the group with CD4 ≤100 cells per cubic millimeter. The test was specific in 559/573 (97.6%) patients without tuberculosis. Sensitivity of the urine TB LAM test plus sputum smear microscopy was 197/367 (53.7%) overall and 133/196 (67.9%) among those with CD4 ≤100. CD4 ≤50 [adjusted odds ratio (AOR), 6.2; P < 0.001] or 51-100 (AOR, 7.1; P < 0.001), mycobacteremia (AOR, 6.1; P < 0.01) and hospitalization (AOR, 2.6; P = 0.03) were independently associated with a positive TB LAM test.In HIV-positive adults with CD4 ≤100, the TB LAM urine test detected over half of culture-positive tuberculosis patients, in <30 minutes and without the need for equipment or reagents.Adjunctive tests for diagnosis of tuberculosis: serology, ELISPOT for site-specific lymphocytes, urinary lipoarabinomannan, string test, and fine needle aspiration.The diagnostic gold standard for active tuberculosis (TB) is the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) by culture or molecular methods. However, despite its limited sensitivity, sputum smear microscopy is still the mainstay of TB diagnosis in resource-limited settings. Consequently, diagnosis of smear-negative pulmonary and extrapulmonary TB remains challenging in such settings. A number of novel or alternative techniques could provide adjunctive diagnostic use in the context of difficult-to-diagnose TB. These may be especially useful in certain patient groups such as persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and children, who are disproportionably affected by smear-negative and extrapulmonary disease and who are also most adversely affected by delays in TB diagnosis and treatment. We review a selection of these methods that are independent of nucleic acid amplification techniques and could largely be implemented in resource-limited settings in current or adapted versions. Specifically, we discuss the diagnostic use and potential of serologic tests based on detection of antibodies to MTB antigens; interferon gamma release assays using site-specific lymphocytes; detection of lipoarabinomannan, a glycolipid of MTB, in urine; the string test, a novel technique to retrieve lower respiratory tract samples; and fine needle aspiration biopsy of lymph nodes.Can point-of-care urine LAM strip testing for tuberculosis add value to clinical decision making in hospitalised HIV-infected persons?The urine lipoarabinomannan (LAM) strip-test (Determine®-TB) can rapidly rule-in TB in HIV-infected persons with advanced immunosuppression. However, given high rates of empiric treatment amongst hospitalised patients in high-burden settings (≈ 50%) it is unclear whether LAM can add any value to clinical decision making, or identify a subset of patients with unfavourable outcomes that would otherwise have been missed by empiric treatment.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with suspected TB received urine LAM strip testing, and were categorised as definite (culture-positive), probable-, or non-TB. Both the proportion and morbidity of TB cases identified by LAM testing, early empiric treatment (initiated prior to test result availability) and a set of clinical predictors were compared across groups.187/281 patients had either definite- (n = 116) or probable-TB (n = 71). As a rule-in test for definite and probable-TB, LAM identified a similar proportion of TB cases compared to early empiric treatment (85/187 vs. 93/187, p = 0.4), but a greater proportion than classified by a set of clinical predictors alone (19/187; p<0.001). Thirty-nine of the 187 (21%) LAM-positive patients who had either definite- or probable-TB were missed by early empiric treatment, and of these 25/39 (64%) would also have been missed by smear microscopy. Thus, 25/187 (8%) of definite- or probable-TB patients with otherwise delayed initiation of TB treatment could be detected by the LAM strip test. LAM-positive patients missed by early empiric treatment had a lower median CD4 count (p = 0.008), a higher median illness severity score (p = 0.001) and increased urea levels (p = 0.002) compared to LAM-negative patients given early empiric treatment.LAM strip testing outperformed TB diagnosis based on clinical criteria but in day-to-day practice identified a similar proportion of patients compared to early empiric treatment. However, compared to empiric treatment, LAM identified a different subset of patients with more advanced immunosuppression and greater disease severity.Comparison of a clinical prediction rule and a LAM antigen-detection assay for the rapid diagnosis of TBM in a high HIV prevalence setting.The diagnosis of tuberculous meningitis (TBM) in resource poor TB endemic environments is challenging. The accuracy of current tools for the rapid diagnosis of TBM is suboptimal. We sought to develop a clinical-prediction rule for the diagnosis of TBM in a high HIV prevalence setting, and to compare performance outcomes to conventional diagnostic modalities and a novel lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen detection test (Clearview-TB®) using cerebrospinal fluid (CSF).Patients with suspected TBM were classified as definite-TBM (CSF culture or PCR positive), probable-TBM and non-TBM.Of the 150 patients, 84% were HIV-infected (median [IQR] CD4 count = 132 [54; 241] cells/µl). There were 39, 55 and 54 patients in the definite, probable and non-TBM groups, respectively. The LAM sensitivity and specificity (95%CI) was 31% (17;48) and 94% (85;99), respectively (cut-point ≥ 0.18). By contrast, smear-microscopy was 100% specific but detected none of the definite-TBM cases. LAM positivity was associated with HIV co-infection and low CD4 T cell count (CD4<200 vs. >200 cells/µl; p = 0.03). The sensitivity and specificity in those with a CD4<100 cells/µl was 50% (27;73) and 95% (74;99), respectively. A clinical-prediction rule ≥ 6 derived from multivariate analysis had a sensitivity and specificity (95%CI) of 47% (31;64) and 98% (90;100), respectively. When LAM was combined with the clinical-prediction-rule, the sensitivity increased significantly (p<0.001) to 63% (47;68) and specificity remained high at 93% (82;98).Despite its modest sensitivity the LAM ELISA is an accurate rapid rule-in test for TBM that has incremental value over smear-microscopy. The rule-in value of LAM can be further increased by combination with a clinical-prediction rule, thus enhancing the rapid diagnosis of TBM in HIV-infected persons with advanced immunosuppression.Clinical diagnostic utility of IP-10 and LAM antigen levels for the diagnosis of tuberculous pleural effusions in a high burden setting.Current tools for the diagnosis of tuberculosis pleural effusions are sub-optimal. Data about the value of new diagnostic technologies are limited, particularly, in high burden settings. Preliminary case control studies have identified IFN-gamma-inducible-10 kDa protein (IP-10) as a promising diagnostic marker; however, its diagnostic utility in a day-to-day clinical setting is unclear. Detection of LAM antigen has not previously been evaluated in pleural fluid.We investigated the comparative diagnostic utility of established (adenosine deaminase [ADA]), more recent (standardized nucleic-acid-amplification-test [NAAT]) and newer technologies (a standardized LAM mycobacterial antigen-detection assay and IP-10 levels) for the evaluation of pleural effusions in 78 consecutively recruited South African tuberculosis suspects. All consenting participants underwent pleural biopsy unless contra-indicated or refused. The reference standard comprised culture positivity for M. tuberculosis or histology suggestive of tuberculosis.Of 74 evaluable subjects 48, 7 and 19 had definite, probable and non-TB, respectively. IP-10 levels were significantly higher in TB vs non-TB participants (p<0.0001). The respective outcomes [sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV %] for the different diagnostic modalities were: ADA at the 30 IU/L cut-point [96; 69; 90; 85], NAAT [6; 93; 67; 28], IP-10 at the 28,170 pg/ml ROC-derived cut-point [80; 82; 91; 64], and IP-10 at the 4035 pg/ml cut-point [100; 53; 83; 100]. Thus IP-10, using the ROC-derived cut-point, missed approximately 20% of TB cases and mis-diagnosed approximately 20% of non-TB cases. By contrast, when a lower cut-point was used a negative test excluded TB. The NAAT had a poor sensitivity but high specificity. LAM antigen-detection was not diagnostically useful.Although IP-10, like ADA, has sub-optimal specificity, it may be a clinically useful rule-out test for tuberculous pleural effusions. Larger multi-centric studies are now required to confirm our findings.Point-of-care detection of lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine for diagnosis of HIV-associated tuberculosis: a state of the art review.Detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis antigens in urine is attractive as a potential means of diagnosing tuberculosis (TB) regardless of the anatomical site of disease. The most promising candidate antigen is the cell wall lipopolysaccharide antigen lipoarabinomannan (LAM), which has been used to develop commercially available enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. Although highly variable diagnostic accuracy has been observed in different clinical populations, it is now clear that this assay has useful sensitivity for diagnosis of HIV-associated TB in patients with advanced immunodeficiency and low CD4 cell counts. Thus, this assay is particularly useful when selectively used among patients enrolling in antiretroviral treatment services or in HIV-infected patients requiring admission to hospital medical wards. These are the very patients who have the highest mortality risk and who stand to gain the most from rapid diagnosis, permitting immediate initiation of TB treatment. A recently developed low-cost, lateral-flow (urine 'dip-stick') format of the assay provides a result within 30 minutes and is potentially a major step forward as it can be used at the point-of-care, making the possibility of immediate diagnosis and treatment a reality. This paper discusses the likely utility of this point-of-care assay and how it might best be used in combination with other diagnostic assays for TB. The many further research studies that are needed on this assay are described. Consideration is particularly given to potential reasons for the variable specificity observed in existing field evaluations of LAM ELISAs. Whether this might be related to the assay itself or to the challenges associated with study design is discussed.Urinary lipoarabinomannan as predictor for the tuberculosis immune reconstitution inflammatory syndrome.Upon initiation of antiretroviral therapy (ART), 15.7% [95% confidence interval (CI): 9.7% to 24.5%] of tuberculosis (TB)-HIV-coinfected individuals experience paradoxical worsening of their clinical status with exuberant inflammation consistent with immune reconstitution inflammatory syndrome (IRIS). We investigated whether a positive urinary TB lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test before ART initiation was associated with development of paradoxical TB-IRIS.In a prospective observational cohort in Mulago Hospital, Kampala, Uganda, we measured pre-ART urinary LAM concentrations in HIV-infected patients on TB treatment. Patients who developed TB-IRIS (according to the International Network for the Study of HIV-associated IRIS case definition) were compared with patients who remained IRIS free for at least 3 months.Twenty-six individuals with TB-IRIS and 64 without IRIS were included in the analysis. The median time to TB-IRIS was 14 days (interquartile range: 11-14 days). Univariate analysis showed that a positive pre-ART urinary LAM test [OR: 4.6 (95% CI: 1.5 to 13.8), P = 0.006] and a CD4 count <50 cells/mL [OR: 21 (95% CI: 2.6 to 169.4), P = 0.004] were associated with an increased risk of TB-IRIS. In multivariate analysis, only a baseline CD4 T-cell count <50 cells/mL was predictive of IRIS (P < 0.004). Sensitivity and specificity of a positive pre-ART urinary LAM test to diagnose IRIS were 80.8% (95% CI: 60.6 to 93.4) and 52.4% (95% CI: 39.4 to 65.1), respectively.If CD4 T-cell count testing is available, a pre-highly active antiretroviral therapy urinary LAM test has no added value to predict TB-IRIS. When CD4 T-cell count is not available, a positive LAM test could identify patients at increased risk of TB-IRIS.Diagnostic accuracy of a low-cost, urine antigen, point-of-care screening assay for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis before antiretroviral therapy: a descriptive study.The diagnostic accuracy of sputum smear microscopy and routine chest radiology for HIV-associated tuberculosis is poor, and culture-based diagnosis is slow, expensive, and is unavailable in most resource-limited settings. We assessed the diagnostic accuracy of a urine antigen test Determine TB-LAM Ag (Determine TB-LAM; Alere, Waltham, MA, USA) for screening for HIV-associated pulmonary tuberculosis before antiretroviral therapy (ART).In this descriptive study, consecutive adults referred to a community-based ART clinic in Gugulethu township, South Africa, were all screened for tuberculosis by obtaining sputum samples for fluorescence microscopy, automated liquid culture (gold-standard test), and Xpert MTB/RIF assays (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) and urine samples for the Clearview TB-ELISA (TB-ELISA; Alere, Waltham, MA, USA) and Determine TB-LAM test. Patients with Mycobacterium tuberculosis cultured from one or more sputum samples were defined as cases of tuberculosis. The diagnostic accuracy of Determine TB-LAM used alone or combined with sputum smear microscopy was compared with that of sputum culture and the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for all patients and subgroups of patients stratified by CD4 cell count.Patients were recruited between March 12, 2010, and April 20, 2011. Of 602 patients enrolled, 542 were able to provide one or more sputum samples, and 94 had culture-positive tuberculosis (prevalence 17·4%, 95% CI 14·2-20·8). Complete results from all tests were available for 516 patients (median CD4 count, 169·5 cells per μL; IQR 100-233), including 85 culture-positive tuberculosis, 24 of whom (28·2%, 95% CI 19·0-39·0) had sputum smear-positive disease. Determine TB-LAM test strips provided results within 30 min. Agreement was very high between two independent readers of the test strips (κ=0·97) and between the test strips and TB-ELISA (κ=0·84). Determine TB-LAM had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66·7% (95% CI 41·0-86·7) at <50 cells per μL, 51·7% (32·5-70·6) at <100 cells per μL, and 39·0% (26·5-52·6) at <200 cells per μL; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. When combined with smear microscopy (either test positive), sensitivity was 72·2% (95% CI 46·5-90·3) at CD4 counts less than 50 cells per μL, 65·5% (45·7-82·1) at less than 100 cells per μL, and 52·5% (39·1-65·7) at less than 200 cells per μL, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost, alternative to existing diagnostic assays for tuberculosis screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4 cell counts and provides important incremental yield when combined with sputum smear microscopy.Wellcome Trust.Antigen detection as a point-of-care test for TB: the case of lipoarabinomannan.The limitations of sputum smear microscopy, routine chest radiology for HIV-associated TB and culture-based diagnosis are well recognized, especially in resource-limited settings. The diagnostic accuracy of a new point-of-care lateral-flow urine strip test for lipoarabinomannan (Determine(®) TB-LAM; Alere, MA, USA), which costs US$3.50 per test strip and provides results within 30 min, was evaluated in a cohort of South African patients for HIV-associated TB before starting anti-retroviral therapy in South Africa. Prevalence of culture-positive TB cases was 17.4%, among which 28.2% had sputum smear positivity. Determine(®) TB-LAM (Alere, MA, USA) had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66.7, 51.7 and 39.0% at <50 cells, <100 cells and <200 cells per µl, respectively; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. There was an incremental sensitivity when Determine TB-LAM was combined with smear microscopy, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF (Cepheid; CA, USA) assay. Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost alternative to existing diagnostic assays for TB screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4(+) cell counts.Utility of a novel lipoarabinomannan assay for the diagnosis of tuberculous meningitis in a resource-poor high-HIV prevalence setting.In Africa, tuberculous meningitis (TBM) is an important opportunistic infection in HIV-positive patients. Current diagnostic tools for TBM perform sub-optimally. In particular, the rapid diagnosis of TBM is challenging because smear microscopy has a low yield and PCR is not widely available in resource-poor settings.We evaluated the performance outcome of a novel standardized lipoarabinomannan (LAM) antigen-detection assay, using archived cerebrospinal fluid samples, in 50 African TBM suspects of whom 68% were HIV-positive.Of the 50 participants 14, 23 and 13 patients had definite, probable and non-TBM, respectively. In the non-TB group there were 5 HIV positive patients who were lost to follow-up and in whom concomitant infection with Mycobacterium tuberculosis could not be definitively excluded. The test sensitivities and specificities were as follows: LAM assay 64% and 69% (cut-point 0.22), smear microscopy 0% and 100% and PCR 93% and 77%, respectively.In this preliminary proof-of-concept study, a rapid diagnosis of TBM could be achieved using LAM antigen detection. Although specificity was sub-optimal, the estimates provided here may be unreliable because of a classification bias inherent in the study design where it was not possible to exclude TBM in the presumed non-TBM cases owing to a lack of clinical follow-up. As PCR is largely unavailable, the LAM assay may well prove to be a useful adjunct for the rapid diagnosis of TBM in high HIV-incidence settings. These preliminary results justify further enquiry and prospective studies are now required to definitively establish the place of this technology for the diagnosis of TBM.Single-molecule detection on a protein-array assay platform for the exposure of a tuberculosis antigen.Based on a single-molecule sensitive fluorescence-linked immunosorbent assay, an analytical platform for the detection of lipoarabinomannan (LAM), a lipopolysaccharide marker of tuberculosis, was established that is about 3 orders of magnitude more sensitive than comparable current ELISA assays. No amplification step was required. Also, no particular sample preparation had to be done. Since individual binding events are detected, true quantification was possible simply by counting individual signals. Utilizing a total internal reflection configuration, unprocessed biological samples (human urine and plasma) to which LAM was added could be analyzed without the requirement of sample purification or washing steps during analysis. Samples containing about 600 antigen molecules per microliter produced a distinct signal. The methodology developed can be employed for any set of target molecules for which appropriate antibodies exist.Prognostic value of a quantitative analysis of lipoarabinomannan in urine from patients with HIV-associated tuberculosis.Detection of the mycobacterial cell wall antigen lipoarabinomannan (LAM) in urine can be used to diagnose HIV-associated tuberculosis (TB) using a qualitative (positive/negative) read-out. However, it is not known whether the quantity of LAM present in urine provides additional prognostic information.Consecutively recruited adult outpatients initiating antiretroviral therapy (ART) in South Africa were investigated for TB regardless of clinical symptoms using sputum smear microscopy and liquid culture (reference standard). Urine samples were tested using the Clearview TB-ELISA for LAM and the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. The ELISA optical densities (OD) were used as a quantitative assessment of urine LAM. Among 514 patients with complete sputum and urine LAM OD results, culture-confirmed TB was diagnosed in 84 patients. Twenty-three (27.3%) were LAM-positive with a median LAM OD of 0.68 (IQR 0.16-2.43; range, 0.10-3.29) and 61 (72.6%) were LAM negative (LAM OD <0.1 above background). Higher LAM ODs were associated with a range of prognostic indices, including lower CD4 cell counts, lower haemoglobin levels, higher blood neutrophil counts and higher mycobacterial load as assessed using both sputum and urine samples. The median LAM OD among patients who died was more than 6.8-fold higher than that of patients who remained alive at 3 months (P<0.001). The small number of deaths, however, precluded adequate assessment of mortality risk stratified according to urine LAM OD.In patients with HIV-associated TB, concentrations of LAM in urine were strongly associated with a range of poor prognostic characteristics known to be associated with mortality risk. Urine LAM assays with a semi-quantitative (negative vs. low-positive vs. high-positive) read-out may have improved clinical utility over assays with a simple binary result.HIV-associated tuberculosis: relationship between disease severity and the sensitivity of new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic assays.Reducing mortality from HIV-associated tuberculosis (TB) requires diagnostic tools that are rapid and have high sensitivity among patients with poor prognosis. We determined the relationship between disease severity and the sensitivity of new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic assays.Consecutive ambulatory patients enrolling for antiretroviral treatment in South Africa were screened for TB regardless of symptoms using diagnostic assays prospectively applied to sputum (fluorescence smear microscopy, Xpert MTB/RIF and liquid culture (reference standard)) and retrospectively applied to stored urine samples (Determine TB-LAM and Xpert MTB/RIF). Assay sensitivities were calculated stratified according to pre-defined indices of disease severity: CD4 count, symptom intensity, serum C-reactive protein (CRP), hemoglobin concentration and vital status at 90 days.Sputum culture-positive TB was diagnosed in 15% (89/602) of patients screened and data from 86 patients were analyzed (median CD4 count, 131 cells/μL) including 6 (7%) who died. The sensitivity of sputum microscopy was 26.7% overall and varied relatively little with disease severity. In marked contrast, the sensitivities of urine-based and sputum-based diagnosis using Determine TB-LAM and Xpert MTB/RIF assays were substantially greater in sub-groups with poorer prognosis. Rapid diagnosis from sputum and/or urine samples was possible in >80% of patients in sub-groups with poor prognosis as defined by either CD4 counts <100 cells/μL, advanced symptoms, CRP concentrations >200 mg/L or hemoglobin <8.0 g/dl. Retrospective testing of urine samples with Determine TB-LAM correctly identified all those with TB who died.The sensitivities of Xpert MTB/RIF and Determine TB-LAM for HIV-associated TB were highest among HIV-infected patients with the most advanced disease and poorest prognostic characteristics. These data provide strong justification for large-scale intervention studies that assess the impact on survival of screening using these new sputum-based and urine-based diagnostic approaches.